Never has the thought been given by these bleeding hearts to the possibility that the implementation Apartheid was an act of survival by white South Africans to isolate them from the attentions of blacks that we see currently in a form and on a scale that by any definition can be labeled a Genocide of whites in SA.
It's always nice to get mail. In the week we received this from Sarah, who also very kindly attached a few photographs she took of the stink-pipes in question. I've included them below:
Carrying the pain inside
Just to see that smile light up your face
If you have the correct mindset, anything is possible. If you have the right intentions and want to change for the betterment of yourself, you must force yourself to keep the habits. You must be consistent.
We got back to our bikes at about 3am and were very grateful that the clocks were put back for daylight savings giving us an extra hour of sleep!
American President Bush in his first, brief, statement on the multiple attacks on the United States in 2001, the president according to BBC said: “Conduct a full-scale investigation to hunt down and to find those folks who committed this act. Terrorism against our nation will not stand.” And later in a full speech I culled this: “These acts of mass murder were intended to frighten our nation into chaos and retreat, but they have failed.” I watched President Bush live and I saw the strong convictions in his words and demonstrations. It is such that sends a threatening signal to whoever masterminded the attacks. I can’t really recollect any major terror attack on US soil after these words were sent.(I stand to be corrected please).
The SGPC elections assume significance this time as these will set the tone for the assembly elections in Punjab scheduled for February 2011.
Fool - The character loses 200 experience points and must draw from the deck again.
His head was bald of flesh and of hair,
Political correctness may currently define what is acceptable but its strictures will never abide. I have lost track of the number of times I’ve been told off for using the word ‘midget’ recently but my mind naturally reaches for it when looking for a shorthand way of expressing the unexpected. Midget. Earlobe. Lubricated. Onion. Stripper. Owl. I know that three of these words might offend people below four feet but I have never heard either Ant or Dec complain. And is there anything funnier than a midget stripper? A lubricated onion? A heavily earlobed Owl? Unless, of course, you’re the producers at Channel 4 who wouldn’t allow the talent to book the acts for the final show of a successful series.
Gatien was a club owner who gobbled up nightclub spaces and transformed them into branded clubs called the Limelight -- first in Hollywood, Florida, then Atlanta, and London. (He would eventually own many clubs in Manhattan, including the Tunnel, the Palladium downtown, and Club USA.) The Gothic church on 6th Ave proved too enticing -- the one in London was also in a former house of worship -- and soon Gatien turned the once reverent spot into a house of decadence.
Guineas fly and they will head to the tallest tree and roost there, so I need to have them trained enough to come down at night and roost in the barn where the hen house is located. Otherwise I am sure the owls or hawks will have one dandy dinner. So this is another reason for my logic – they will befriend the chickens and follow them to roost at night…….right?
Tired eyes
When the last company I worked for created a human resources department, the new HR manager decided that she needed to foster a 'team' culture. Weekly meetings were set up, with the most excrutiatingly embarrassing team-building activities: "Okay, today I want you to write what each person's strengths and weaknesses are on a post-it note and stick it up on the wall..." (apparently I was 'friendly' and 'polite').
As the class time came to a close he had the four conglomerates share their descriptions.
Paris may stir up images of the perfect romance for some, strolling hand in hand, arm slipped lightly through arm, with an elegant Parisien or Parisienne dressed head to toe in Dior under the Eiffel Tower or in the brilliant moonlight under the sparkling lights lining the Champs Elysées. Or shopping on the très chic Avenue Montaigne, snapping up Chanel suits or that perfect little black dress paired with those gorgeous Louboutins. Or Paris, where art meets the intellectual, spending an afternoon admiring the Renoirs and Monets, studying La Joconde or Le Penseur, or sipping absinthe in a sidewalk café with your literary circle debating Sartre or Camus. Old men playing boules in the Jardin du Luxembourg, couples entwined on fountain edges in Les Tuileries, well-dressed children scampering through the zoo at le Jardin des Plantes or under la Roseraie.
So here's what we are eating this week:
(2) It is increasingly evident that there was a considerable knowledge of Greek in Palestine itself, so that we cannot affirm that the earliest church must have spoken Aramaic (and Hebrew and not used Greek.
The morning after her birthday, Hazel boards a flight to L.A. only to get the surprise of her life. When she's bumped up to first class, extra legroom and free drinks are absolutely the last things on her mind when she catches sight of her seatmate: her all-time biggest celebrity crush, rock star Finn Schiller! Only the night before she'd confessed her infatuation with the gorgeous musician, and her boyfriend joked that she had a free pass if she ever met him. Hazel can't believe fate has actually thrown them together.
I shot out of the chair and wrenched open the door. Doris stood before a pile of all skulls and legs and what-have-you. She didn’t look pleased.
Maybelline Natural Smokes quad(crease and lower lashline, the brown labeled "crease")
My Achilles' heel.
and at the time they seem painful and unfair,
Curiosity getting the better of me, I said , ‘Yes you are correct . But how on earth did you know that?’
What about Kipling. Again it is the clarity of taste that appeals. Full of tropical flavours and each one pin sharp in a beer that translates brilliantly to bottle. If you want to know more, buy a pint of Kipling, or purchase a bottle with confidence. Well worth the money spent I have to say. Someone at Thornbridge has got this bottling game cracked. OK I only had two samples, but boy were they good. They know their stuff there. They have great brewing skills and technique, bring out some tremendous beers and just quietly get on with doing it, which makes me admire them even more.
Danger Lights has some of the only known footage of the Milwaukee Road’s steam operations on the Rocky Mountain Division. During this time, the Milwaukee had electrified this portion of the line, however, you never see any of the Electric operations. Another interesting fact is that the name “Milwaukee Road” is never mentioned in the movie, but you can clearly tell, since the railroad Plastered its name where it could through out the movie. Here is a fact for the movie buffs.
The day that I had his belongings moved out of the house came about because he would not come and get his things. When he did come by it was only to assess what I was doing in the house and who was living there. Rather than have him continue to manipulate things I took the situation into my own hands.
(In Ireland, they pronounce it Kawtch-leen, in Wales, Cawth-lin. I say Cate-lin, thereby mangling my own name in two places. Ooops.)
Notice that I agree that anyone can experience temporary setbacks or illnesses. I was NOT saying that parents should lose their children if they become disabled or ill. I was saying that parents should not be allowed to conceive and bring children into the world KNOWING they are unable to properly care for them — that is the distinction with a difference here.
Thank you so much to you all for joining in our challenge last month, there were so many lovely projects I am glad I didn't have to pick the winners!
I love this image of Oliphant in the Easter Egg, although how big that egg must be to fit an elephant in doesn't bear thinking about, mmmmmm imagine how much yummy chocolate it would contain though. I hope it's Galaxy chocolate, my favourite!
I remember when she was handed to me, and she was floppy and damp and tiny and REAL, and she had BLONDE hair. Shockingly obvious blonde hair. I was being congratulated for the fast pushing, and really, the rest of the delivery process was a blur-- an easy blur-- while I soaked in the truth of this new little person in my arms, so real and so THERE. So different from the 20-minute wait to hold Noah after my C-section. It was amazing.
8 (3 to 4-ounces each) beef scaloppini (from London Broil or Top Sirloin)
Here is what our design team have put together to inspire you...
Completing these quests grants you a 15 minute +10% out of combat run speed buff and reward 1 anniversary token each.
2. The electoral process must be cleaned before the 13th General Elections.
I do not think what he said was acceptable. I do not agree with him on everything he says. I find him to be an entertaining curmudgeon 80% of the time and an arsehole 20% of the time. I find that an acceptable ratio. Enjoying some of what he does and says doesn’t mean I automatically subscribe to the rest of what he does and says. I find the victimisation, dogpiling and demonisation of him EQUALLY unacceptable to his original comments and it smacks of a horseshit excuse to attack someone you didn’t like and whom you couldn’t otherwise get at. My concern over your abysmal behaviour towards another human being is not approval of what he said or did. It is disapproval of what YOU are saying and doing and I believe everyone deserves another shot if they apologise.
Little Hands-on ABC’s and 123’s is a bi-monthly feature that focuses on practical and simple ideas that you can do at home to help your tot develop their letter and number skills.
I can choose a spot for the sun to shine from and by placing my rays of light over my image I can easily see where the light hits first (highlights) and where the light leaves the object or hits the ground (shadow areas). Since this is on plastic I can easily move it around and see where the most interesting shadows are, or where I would have the easiest time adding shadows.
Once the dough has doubled in size, you need to knock it back. This is one of my favourite bits of bread making, other than kneading. You get to punch the soft, air filled dough to knock the air out and it’s strangely very satisfying. Give the dough another quick knead for about a minute to knock any extra air out and then shape it. Make you oil whatever tin you’re cooking the bread in. My first bread making experience was pretty disasterous as I didn’t realise I needed to do and my entire loaf was glued to the tin and had to be ripped apart to eat it. If you’re adding flavouring to the bread, you need to add it now and knead it in and shape it once you have everything nicely mixed. Once you have the dough shaped in whatever you’re making, then allow to prove for a second time in a warm place, again until it has doubled in size.
The Core Values
I need to admit something else. I've been cheating on PKD, researching mystery author Dashiell Hammett's life and work. Now I'm not going to create a blog about him or anything (!), but he is an interesting author who writes very much with the same simple and efficient prose as PKD. I remember reading somewhere that Dick called the Millenium Falcon from Star Wars the Maltese Falcon, so I think it's a pretty safe bet that Dick read Hammett. The Crack in Space even has a kind of Spade-like detective, albeit with pyloric spasms.
Once we checked in, Chris was given some paperwork to read over and a code that he could use to check my progress on a monitor. I was called to pre-op almost immediately with three other patients who were also having various surgeries. They set me up in a little curtained-off area with a recliner where I changed into the hospital gown, was given an IV, took a pregnancy test (which I knew would be negative, sob) and answered a bunch of questions about my medical history. When she was putting in the IV, she couldn't do it in the back of my hand like she prefers, because I have "tiny" veins. She has to do it in the crook of my elbow, which meant I had to keep my arm straight...a problem since they put it in my left arm and I'm left handed. So ouch. After about 45 minutes, they brought Chris back to wait with me. Dr. Haney, a few of his staff, the anesthesiologist, and a few residents talked to us, answering any questions we had and giving the details of how the next two days would progress. I was under the impression that I'd be given the choice between general anesthesia and a spinal, but I don't remember them actually asking. I told them about my bad epidural experience, so maybe they made the choice for me based on that. The nurse then walked me back to the OR room, and Chris went back to the waiting room.
Now the pieces are beginning to fall into place. From history, we know that the First Epistle to Timothy was written sometime between 65 and 66 AD. We also know, from history, that Paul’s second missionary journey (when he first found Timothy) began in 49 AD. So if Timothy was under the age of 30 at the time when Paul advises him not to allow anyone to look down upon him for his youth, then we can rightfully conclude that Timothy was roughly 10 to 12 years old when Paul first encounters him in the small, out-of-the-way town known as Lystra.
Everyone has their favorite Nashville watering hole. We enjoyed the Big Bang Bar this trip. They have “dueling pianos” and play requests. While we were there, they seemed to know everything that was requested. A lot a talent on display and a lot fun interacting with the musicians.
I have been experimenting with using the palate knife for texture in my paintings something that I have not done before. The process if different for me, the drying time is longer due to the thickness of the paints but I was happy with the results in the long run. I am also using smaller canvas which cuts makes it easier to paint everyday.
Erica Smolders – Oh wow...I don’t know! I’m still just the new kid on the block. Ask me again in 5 years?
We keep repeating the same hurtful behavior over and over again. We let our bad habits control us. We refuse to let old wounds heal.
“You, a pineapple have the nerve to challenge me, a hare, to a race,” the hare asked the pineapple. “This must be some sort of joke.”
I have had the Zumba videos for about a year now but I know that you can find some videos online as well. Here is just a snippet of what fun Zumba can be! Enjoy!
Romney’s frequent struggles with telling the truth give us a lot to cover. This week, we wrote a post that chronicles many of Romney’s whoppers, including this one that’s laden with irony: “If I’m President of the United States, with your help, I will tell the truth.” Check out this list, and make sure others see it, too:
Ill be under the impression
Oh well. Phuket.
But come to think of it, one day I’ll get way older and my grandchildren will probably be curious about those funny scribbles on their grandma’s wrinkly shoulder and be like “Lola, what’s that thingy on your back?”
― John Lennon
A great childhood memory!
If you do, thanks for stopping by!
When I do get out of bed this morning, he says, “How did you sleep?” I told him not well, because I had already woken up once in the night for awhile, not to mention him waking me up later.
Her newest collection, Spring Awakening, has built on her previous strengths while embracing new silhouettes and colors. If you're a fan of brightly colored lingerie, this is your collection.
Left to Right: Sally Hansen – Ice, AQumore – P039, LA Girls – Enchanting, NYX – Perfect Gray, Sinful Colors – Easy Going, NYX – Dreamy Glitter, Essence – King of Mints, Revlon – Starry Pink (aka Popular), FingerPaints – Gossamer White, and a limited edition tinted SoftLips SPF 15 in pearl (never opened, of course)!
We drove past the first ambulance, drove past the second ambulance, drove past the paramedics, past the closed Up the Creek comedy club (it was a Tuesday) and, as we turned left into the one-way system in the middle of Greenwich, I looked right and saw a lone policemen standing in the middle of the street stopping traffic turning into Creek Road. The traffic was queued-up, the drivers probably pissed-off. By the time they turned into Creek Road, the ambulances and police car would be gone and there would be nothing to see.
Of course…I couldn’t have a Christmas tree post without some night shots. My favorite. :)
Oh dear, poor people can't afford to buy anything. The economy is shrinking. Everyone's still in debt. Government's still in debt. Deficit bad, very very bad.
One day, there was an unusual number of nuns involved. That day, the technique changed. The nuns just lay down on the pavement, shrouding themselves with Tibetan Snow Lion flags. It was so unexpected, even the police started laughing. Their gentle prostration turned everyone's expectations on their heads.
& Out_Side Night—
26. Tequila -- The Champs
The BBC should hang its head in shame.
the office. I however have still got a crap ton of things to work out
He looks very familiar.
But you constantly teach me compassion and intercession:
The night before, a baby had died, and with a basket of her own fresh bread Mama was making the prescribed call on the family. She toiled painfully up the railless stairs, stopping often for breath. At the top a door opened into a single room that was obviously cooking, eating, and sleeping quarters all at once. There were already many visitors, most of them standing for lack of chairs. Mama went at once to the young mother, but I stood frozen on the threshold. Just to the right of the door, so still in the homemade crib, was the baby.
Though I am keeping all the ticket stubs.
Which connection I should cut
Wow it has been forver since I have posted anything! I am super sorry.
2. continual change to create confusion
The Draco fleet is expected to reach the Kuiper Belt within 4-6 weeks; they want to in orbit of Mars and the Earth before many humans begin to shift to the Fifth density, where the Dracos cannot reach them.
These turned out so well! They're a flavorful, non-greasy alternative for nights when we're craving something naughty that we won't regret the next day. Try them! ASAP!
B They would have been mad at the hare for winning.
Grown to hide the mess I've made
“Ya, bagus!” Again, Winwin says, with a huge smile and thumbs up.
Andrew deWaard, University of British Columbia. Mise-en-Synergy and Soundscapes
9) The Long Gone Halcyon Days of the Golden Age of Porn - Once upon a time, porn was something very different than what it is now. Granted, it was still very far from respectable, but back in the 1970's, the porn industry was filled with men and women that wanted to create art - and believed they actually were. Compared to today's age of internet porn excess (really, who can not find every single pornographic fetish with a mere click of a mouse!?) this so-called golden age was an age of porn auteurs. Films like Deep Throat proved that one could create porn with certain artistic values. Sure, it is not high art, but at least at the time, it was some sort of art.
I hate it when some bars use a cloth to wipe the top of the glass.
The reptoids passed.
WORDS FROM THOM: (It’s not my meme; I have only copy-pasted Thom’s words to save some typing time):
reconciliation. For many in my family, nothing has worked.
No! We´ve been over this; we don´t do ghosts, we do angels. And them downstairs do devil stuff.
My regular blog post for today will be coming out a little later on, but first I have something really fun to share with all of you. The wonderful Debra Kristi invited me to write a guest piece for her “Immortal Monday” blog series. I was incredibly honored to be asked and jumped at the chance to accept her offer.
Part of the problem inherent in making movie like this one (or The Black Dahlia, or Summer of Sam), is that in most cases, the events of and around the murders are so well-known that little is left to the filmmaker but to set the camera in the right places. The Zodiac mystery is particularly troublesome for a filmmaker not only because the killer was never found (the catharsis of the catch is denied), but because event stretched out over the course of a decade. Thus, the film stretches out, too – though it’s not quite three hours long, its episodic nature (complete with consistent, detail-oriented title cards) makes it feel terribly drawn out. It’s as if Fincher didn’t want to leave anything out – there are even two full-screen text panels before the final credits roll.
“Abiding” in Christ’s words is pretty descriptive of a student clinging onto every word a master has. Willard remarks that in contemporary American society “Jesus Christ is automatically disassociated from brilliance or intellectual capacity” (19). Thus, capturing the life Jesus lived and walking “in the light” (1 John 1:7) requires following Jesus’s example. If a disciple is to act as Jesus would, then perhaps by doing what Jesus did “when he was not ministering or teaching, we will find ourselves led and enabled to behave as he did when he was on the spot” (30). The spiritual disciplines of a Christian life are our own actions or active plans to become like Christ called us to be. Willard’s premise here is that “grace is opposed to earning not effort”, and God “is in charge of the outcome of our efforts, and that the outcome will be good”(34). The first part of this “effort” regards the practical application of the Sabbath principle.
Me: "No, a stud means really, really handsome."
...of myself.
The play bustles for 90 minutes without interruption, for any intermission would break the flow of the work. Yet at the end, you feel fed and pleased that you've been subjected to modern art for an hour and half without having to make a SAN check.
Whole grain pita bread sandwich for lunch
“Do not be afraid of what you are about to suffer. I tell you, the devil will put some of you in prison to test you, and you will suffer persecution for ten days. Be faithful, even to the point of death, and I will give you the crown of life.” (Revelation 2:10)
Sometimes all it takes is one basic dress...to get your style going. Really, just a basic piece.
Let's go see what the blog design team has created with the cut it out and pop it up challenge this week.
Hashem tells Avraham in Parshat Lech Lecha, after the mitzvah of milah, that he will have a child. The Shem MiShmuel asks, why does Hashem deem it necessary to send an angel in this week’s parsha, Parshat Vayeira, to relay the news again? In addition, what is the connection between these two seemingly unrelated revelations – milah and the birth of Yitzchak?
Now I am no baby-expert but, I am well aware that colic is not good. I have met people who have had colicky babies and it always seems like hell. I immediately googled colic looking for some sign that if it were the case, something could be done. One suggestion was to do the 5 S's which I had learned about in birth class. We tried, it didn't work but, we didn't have a swing. I rushed quickly out the door to Babies R Us to buy one. I never understood how my parents and my husbands parents would be willing to drop any amount of money on something to help us until my defining moment in the swing aisle at Babies R Us. I didn't care how much it was, I wanted the best plug-in swing with vibration, music and white noise with a 6 speed setting. As long as it made my little dude happy, it could have been $500 and I would have gotten it (luckily, and to the relief of my husband, it was only $105 with my coupon).
I think when we talk about some of these things as people who have been members of the same denomination and of churches, as I think my boyhood church was probably very, very similar to your boyhood church, sometimes talking about these things can be far harder than if we were talking to a Muslim or a Hindu or someone far beyond this and I just can’t tell you how much I appreciate the fact that we’re having this conversation and I want you to know that Southern Baptists admire you for your public leadership, for your boldness to share the gospel, for your leadership in the Civil Rights Movement when, quite frankly, you and many others were right when we were wrong. And I say we as a denomination. I was very wrong, but I am an inheritor of the same responsibility. I’m very thankful for the work of the Carter Center and you’ve largely, single-handedly, eradicated Guinea Worm Disease, which I find to be one of the most remarkable things that any human being can say. You’ve been President of the United States, you’ve received the Nobel Peace Prize, but, in terms of the way human beings live, eradicating a deadly disease is just one of the most amazing things that could be said. I also recently noted that you and Mrs. Carter have been married for over sixty-five years and in an age in which, quite frankly, so many of our public leaders model anything but that kind of faithfulness, I just want to tell you, I greatly admire how you’ve demonstrated that marital faithfulness together. And I want to tell you what a great honor it’s been to have a conversation like this and you and I have exchanged ideas at a distance. I’ve written some articles that I felt like I needed to write; you published a very candid open letter to me in the Atlanta Journal Constitution a few years ago, but the great honor is knowing that we can actually have a conversation like this and we can stay by talking about our shared love of the Bible and then talk about where that same Bible and our understanding of it leads us also to differ. These are important things for us to talk about and I
OMG! I could rip my hair out. That’s SO dumb!
Bankrate’s survey includes data provided by the top 10 banks and thrifts in the top 10 markets.
Point of Service or POS plans take the freedom of choice provided in the PPO and the cost savings enabled by HMO coverage and melds them together. Plan participants can go through their PCP and have services covered like in an HMO. They can also choose a provider from the PPO network and coverage will be covered per the PPO rules, or they can go outside both networks and choose any provider they want. If they decide to go outside the networks, they are subject to out-of-network rules.
The picture to the right is an old log cabin we found when we went wandering off the beaten track out in Nangar National Park, which is just out west of us. Judging by it's construction method it's been there for a very long time (in Australian terms) but I wonder why it's not signposted or highlighted in any of the information about the park at all.
It was hard to make out at first, even in person, so I'll tell you what you're looking at: That is a SNAKE eating (swallowing) a FISH!!! The fish was about as big as two decks of cards laid end to end, so pretty big. The snake was huge.
Mr. Wenig mentioned that growth of the use of mobile has been particularly fast, and now accounts for 10% of all its traffic. One item is bought every second from a mobile device, said the company. It is now working to add image recognition to its mobile app, allowing customers to take a picture of a product and search for it on the site.
All of their hard work means that I only have four more candy bars to reveal to you today, Sisters and Brothers. For Part 1 of this four part feature on Old Time Candy I randomly selected 10 bars but this time I picked four more that continued some of the trends above -- two individually bagged treats, a treat I'd never heard of before, and an old favorite of mine.
I’m from a Valley clan: simple, strong and sure; a loving legacy passed down with the secret to life really is a proper pot of tea, and the perfect pie crust.
What do I feel on this day? Lonely. I know I’m not alone, I am far from it. I have constant support from my best friends, even though it’s from continents away. They are all an instant message away, and I don’t have to wait more than 10 seconds for them to get back to me. I could probably keep my cellphone away and start trying to build relationships with people around me, but I have forever been extremely selective of people I let into my life. I choose to bond with a few people, it’s nothing to them. It’s just my personal comfort level and I still don’t know reasons why I am comfortable with someone at all.
Would you like me to invest that for you? lol
Arsenal 15/8 (StanJames), Draw 12/5(Coral), Man United 13/8(PP)
Treating Speech Problems in Children with Autism
Enjoy your day and our reveal ;-)
I began to play I was a mighty hunter, stalking the wild animals and the Indians. I played I was fighting the Indians, until all woods seemed full of wild men, and then all at once I heard the birds twittering 'good night.'
You bet! Spoons, I can do! Nowadays it’s the clunkier kitchen utensils that prove a problem like ladles, cleavers, and don’t even get me started on whisks.
If you have a good marriage, watch it with your spouse. If you have a marriage that could use some work (I think that's most couples) WATCH THIS! Even, if like me, you're headed to divorce court, take a chance and watch the movie together. If it doesn't change the way you think, then what have you lost? Nothing. But you might be surprised. They've received literally thousands of letters from men saying they wanted to date their wives again. In fact, you can read many of them HERE.
I had to give her a hug and tell her it was the best news I’ve heard all year.
Customer reviews & ratings of American Standard 7411.712.295 Hampton Two-Handle Centerset Lavatory Faucet with Speed Connect Pop Up Drain and Porcelain Levers, Satin Nickel are available at the merchant’s website, see it by visit the link below.
The rumpus attracted a lot of media attention including a Sky news van so hopefully this case will be publicised now. We live in hope. Big respect to the Manchester Evening News who ran the story despite the threats from police. Many lads are still in the area and the nonces are still inside the court. How you get bail on such serious charges is anyones guess, as only 4 of them are remanded.
1/2 cup chocolate chips (Microwaved for about 30 seconds - so some are melted, some are not)
8) I made this potato salad to go with dinner last night. I LOVE potato salad. Actually, I love potato anything. #TeamCarbs Potato salad is probably my favorite summertime food (except for anything grilled. And, okay, strawberry shortcake. Ice cream. Fresh blueberries. Mike's Hard Cranberry. Snow Cones. Mojitos). Anyway, this recipe? It was the shit! It was so good and the calories were so low! The only thing I did differently was substitute dill relish for the sweet. And next time I probably won't use celery since I'm not really a fan. But I WILL be making this WEEKLY this summer.
2. Don’t hit snooze.
* Enhance public understanding of shared, free and open source knowledge
They met the tyrant’s brandished steel,
Comfort: 8/10- I was able to wear these for about 6.5 hours before they started bothering my eyes. I have pretty sensitive eyes though, and some days they like circle lenses and some days they don't. Generally, they were pretty comfortable.
3. Choose 5 other blogs deserving of the Liebster.
The Block 4s are also getting upgraded so that they can hit moving targets. This is mainly intended to turn the Tomahawk into an anti-ship missile, although it can also hit moving land targets. The Tomahawk has been a primary land attack weapon for surface ships and submarines since the 1990s. The Block 3 entered service in 1994, but the Block 4 was a big upgrade, adding GPS and the ability to go after a different target while the missile was in flight.
If you fancy making yourself all depressed please feel free to read all about it here, here, here, and here. The last one is from the Daily Mail so is a little like "War for Dummies" but does at least give you a decent summary if you're not up to speed. Which wouldn't be a surprise as everyone is talking about Jimmy Saville, the XFactor and Eurobashing.
Corporate Challenge- Delaware Park- 6:45 p.m.
Anything would be preferable to the veritable circus that is "balancing the budget" in DC. Do these people even know what an actual budget is? When was the last time you think Boehner had to decide whether to stick with his preferred brand of toilet paper, or try the off brand that was on sale, so he could afford to buy laundry detergent, too? Has Nancy Pelosi ever had to think twice about whether she can afford to go out to Sizzler with her husband, or whether it might be cheaper (but just as nice!) to open a bottle of Three Buck Chuck and use up those leftover frozen appetizers from New Years?
There are plenty of folks around, though they'll likely deny it, that see expensive beer as a good thing for a number of reasons. There are aspiring brewers that wish to sell the fruits of their labour at top dollar; there are those that begrudge the cost, or feel superior drinking beer that others can't afford, especially if it is rare and has come from afar (rarity and distance makes for much better beer - a little known factoid.) I could go on, but you get the picture.
- Based on the high ask by the candidates, the managers often ask about the kind of Salary hike that’s being given by competitors.
But Williams couldn’t have gotten away with this con job without the wink and nod complicity of NPR, maybe the better word is disingenuousness. NPR officials certainly were not clueless about Williams two faced con. There he was for all to see shaking and nodding his head in agreement with every conservative flack that paraded across the stage on the O’Reilley show and other conservative gab fests on Fox. His confrontational hit style on Fox fit in neatly with the tone, temper and rabid right echo chamber sound box of the network.
Here's a view taken in front of the fireplace, looking towards the foyer to the left and dining room to the right. In the dining room you can see my next project - a drum table to refinish.
role'
I've been trying so hard to remember who I was as a child but the best I got so far is a weird little dreamer girl.
The President nominated Mr. Cordray last summer. Unfortunately, Republicans in the Senate blocked his confirmation.
This week I am watching a string of old Super Bowl recaps, those brilliant 30-minute vignettes of games long forgotten produced by the venerable NFL Films. Oh, if only college football had the equivalent.
The details behind the ballyhooed elections – that Bush first opposed them and then postponed them for his own benefit – tend to get lost in the media’s boosterism.
I can ignore them, fine. But lately they seem to have grown restless, possibly feeling as if they… deserve more. If you don’t see fit to hand out wads of money, and give them a few spare coins or *gasp* nothing, you will be suitably verbally abused, and at great length too! Un. Fucking. Acceptable.
'Cause everything can change in a minute
4 TBS butter, softened
“It’s only icing sugar. It’ll wipe off,” I say, soothingly.
You may have heard of the legend of the dogwood, sometimes called the Easter Dogwood Legend. It is appropriate for Christmas as well, a celebration of the birth of Jesus.
Game Nutz small
"You're right, and I love you too," she said. "Its just so different, than the mainstream. I didn't grow up with the traditional family, but it was what I have always wanted and dreamed of. Joining the Marines and finding that comraderie...it filled that void, but I was still missing something...and with you...I've never felt this. I guess in some ways too I am apprehensive of sharing you...I don't know how I am supposed to act..."
As women, we take for granted that our bodies do weird things, have odd discharges, bleed sometimes when it is not expected, and so on.
Here's how I made the portfolio:
This presentation was divided into four sections: Definitions and Nuances, A Brief History of Syncretism, Syncretistic Deities, and Syncretism in the Modern World. The program guide’s information on the session read as follows:
Joseph Thornley, CEO of Thornley Fallis
And I’m up in the air looking down at a girl on a bed
#62
Cost: $60 per session (as low as $10/person/session up to 6 people). This includes use of our cardio equipment before and after your session, plus 45 minutes in your own training room, facilitated by our certified personal trainer.
Although we have quite a lot of neighbors around, we do have conservation land behind our house, meaning there's a small area of woods there. And occasionally, we have critters that come out of those woods to pay us a visit. Critters like this raccoon:
This card fits the following challenges;
HERWALDT LA. Greek philosophy, medical ethics, and the influenza vaccine. Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 1993; 14: 15-16.
As for my friend and me, we agreed that it was a fun excuse to wear pink, or red, or white, unapologetically.
The next part was like out of the movies, where you have your legs up and you’re huffing and puffing to push out the baby. It was so, so exciting and intense. I got nervous about the increasing pain, but the doctor said, “When you feel like you need to push, I’ll count to ten, and you push as hard as you can for those ten seconds.”
I don’t really know how to end this post. I don’t really know when all of this will end and normalcy will find its way back into my life. But my goal in all of this is to get back to the source of all joy, all happiness, all confidence: God. I need Him…and the great thing is, He wants me.
From: Theo Black
Beating up on my friends,
- that I don't feel as "big" baby bump wise as I'm sure I appear... hence the comment I received about my doc having my due date right... and the fact that this maternity shirt already seems to be getting short...
When peace like a river attendeth my soul... it is well, it is well with my soul.
Either way, Good effort!
Boots: lassitude & ennui – Prudence (Fantasy Faire)
It is official. The After World of Shadow and Light is changing. All because I couldn’t bring myself to do what was expected of me; to collect Kim’s soul.
The Spirit of Eagle tells me that a healthy sense of pride is not accessible to those who worry constantly over everything small and large. Worry obfuscates pride. It's interesting to think about.
Taken on the Hasselblad, which has square negs, so it is slightly cropped.
Court Reporter Training And Certification
I wonder if this ever happened to Agatha Christie, two pages in and someone shouts, "Ha! The butler did it."
Pissed off that his newly burgeoning relationship with the attractive Schuman had been interrupted he apologises, "Have to go," he says and leaves $50 on the table, "Something's up with the contagion guys."
Analyze business & technical processes for websites Required 4 Years 3 – Expert
All of these ladies are known to leave the sweetest, sometimes very heartfelt commments. I have found most follow a lot of the same blogs I do, so we instantly have a lot in common! I really couldn't think of a more deserving group. They are all so geniune.
Since the sketch I based the card on was designed by Kelly Schirmer, who I believe loves this Sewing Box set maybe even as much as I do, I'm dedicating this card to her. Enjoy!
1 force
“And when Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were of the circumcision contended with him.”
And the kind of places that agents do deal with aren't interested in you because you're not ready for them. So add a third thing to the list: write, perform and spend time on the phone looking for opportunities to perform. Be your own agent. That's pretty much the only advice you can give someone who's starting out. Work as much as you can. You get better. And as you get better, other things will come to you. (Fingers crossed, that'll be happening for me some day soon.)
Excerpted from a workshop in Tucson, AZ on Tuesday, February 20th, 2001
Have you read any books where the author made a leap that was just a little too far? Or maybe way too far?
8. Fill Up Your Heart (5:42)
Though it feels like an engine attempting to kick start, coughing, huffing, puffing. Now granted, it never stalled. I promise, just a matter of motor running and going an unexpected way, disappearing from the radar, even my own radar. And wondering at times what the blue blazes am I doing here?
For the last few weeks DS7 has also been reading a chapter book with his Dad, a fictionalised account of the whole life of Simpson's Donkey: "Simpson's Donkey - A wartime journey to Gallipoli and beyond" by Peter Stanley. This was his own choice, but so timely!
This is a damn tasty strong Belgian pale ale. Here in Indiana you won't find this beer unless you trade for it, but I think a good substitute would be Duvel. I think Duvel is a slightly better beer, but this beer is really good, and if you ever have the chance for a bottle of this I would jump on it.
Em, our protagonist, has her life all played out. However, that's a future her family has decided for her. Because living in a successful and strict family, even if she doesn't realize it, means her lack of freedom. She has finished highschool, will spend the summer in an internship at her father's law firm and will be attending college at fall to study law. Now, what if a letter (from a newly-discovered aunt) comes home inviting her to spend the summer and her B&B like real vacations?
The only thing I want this new novel to be is enjoyable and entertaining. I'll use the conversation from MIND THIEF when Howie and Vivian go on their first date to sum it up:
When one files a bankruptcy, an estate is created. Essentially, everything the person filing (the debtor) owns goes into that estate so that at that moment, the moment of filing, they owe nothing and they own nothing. Now, certain debts cannot be discharged in a bankruptcy so it is not entirely accurate to say the debtor “owes nothing”. And, in fact, the discharge does not happen until the end of the process. Also, it is not entirely accurate to say one “owns nothing”.
And bound together with one hair of my head.
Paul his Chauffeur walks in with an N.Y.P.D Detective.
I am going to read it again and again.
Now why am I supposed to vote democrat again? Because they aren’t as bad as the republicans? It’s like voting to be stabbed in the stomach instead of shot in the head! Why would I vote for a party that makes it easier to put chemicals in my water?
The PGR petition must specify in detail the claims of the patent being challenged and the basis for the challenge, with any necessary supporting documentation. PGR proceedings are open to the public unless determined otherwise by the Patent Board. After a PGR proceeding is initiated, the patent holder will have an opportunity to file a response. During the proceeding, the patent holder has one opportunity as a matter of right to amend the claims, and may only amend the claims subsequently on motion and a showing of good cause. No amendment during a PGR proceeding may enlarge the scope of a claim or add new matter.
“No daddy (or mommy)! Go away!” This usually means you a) haven’t quite woken up yet, b) are taking a VW sized poop, c) need a cocktail. No wait, that’s me.
There was a time, not that long ago, when organisations sending expats gave you a while to come to terms with the idea and to sort yourselves out before you boarded the plane. That was then. This is now. Several of my career guidance clients are only being interviewed for jobs in another country, another region, two months before the post is due to start. Two months is no time at all to sell your car and your generator, research another country, get far enough up the waiting list for a school, find willing homes for the chickens and the dogs, pack your stuff, sort out your tax affairs, maybe squeeze in a quick break and be off. Even if there are two adults in this relationship and one of them isn't in paid employment and can devote herself to it full time. If you're single, or worse, a working single parent, well get burning the midnight oil. I see the stress of it, on the faces of my clients, the ones in employment, under pressure to find a new job in time in a new country where the family wouldn't mind being too much. Researching new issues and roles and how your skills are relevant to a different context and preparing for interview in a new country. Or, most likely, in multiple new countries. And I see it on the faces of my mates, the spouses, seeking to gallantly support, but not push, to say in a bright, brave upbeat voice:
Finally, I came to the public building where the meeting was shortly to begin.
Meet Pnut. He’s the oldest of our pets. What can I say about him? He’s 16 and he’s seen a lot of change in his life. Good old stable Pnut with the milk mustache and the ability to see shadows has been as much a part of our family as BB has.
I present - my Rooibos dress. And it's turned out a bit shorter than I would like. I don't think it's shockingly short, but it's certainly a little out of my normal comfort zone. Perhaps I'm getting prudish in my old age, but I would have preferred it to be a bit longer. I'm aware that this is my fault for not adding a bit to the length. As I'm tall I really should know to expect this.
Being a Halloween nut, I took one last opportunity this year to celebrate, but you can go with any theme you wish.
So now everyone thinks he’s married and he spends his time trying to kill the rumor that refuses to die.
you have put all things under his feet,
Not that it was all dead serious. Alan had an impish, if dry sense of humour, the punchline delivered in the same way as other lecture information was, and this added an element of surprise and colour. In his lecture on the Sanskrit epic, the Ramayana, his long military experience came into play when speaking of Lakshman(a), devoted younger brother of the hero, Rama.
28 January 1999—On board Santa Fe (152 days to deployment)
Once you know what you are looking for on the labels, it’s time to start shopping. Browse your local pet store food aisle, or perform a quick research online. Find a Cat Food that is grain-free, low carbohydrate, and protein-rich and will deliver the meats and poultry your feline craves. Make sure it contains ingredients and nutrient levels which most closely resemble the ancestral diet of cats. Similar to a diet felines would experience in a natural environment, it is essential to provide cats with energy and nutrients derived from meat-based proteins and highly digestible fats.
And that’s the reason why I keep on shouting in your ear…
The best thing about our Christmas and New Year Holiday was just having time together. Broc was home for a week!! He and I met our friends, Ben and Kelly, up in Savannah for a couple of days to celebrate their 24th anniversary. At home, we all played games, watched some football, ate fun food, and tonight it's going to get COLD!- At least by Florida standards. Expected lows are in the 20's so we've covered our plants and outside pipes and our settling in for a cozy evening.
On Music
Tools that I use:
For the salad, cut a pint of grape tomatoes in half, dice two ripe mangoes (I like Ataulfo mangoes, they're so creamy), slice or dice 1/4 of a small red onion, and toss with the dressing. Serve on a bed of lettuce with black beans and diced avocado.
Name Dragos Spring area, comes from a historical story of Prince Dragos, who came to hunt bison, and found this beautiful area. We invite you to discover the whole story where the prince lived Dragos
The a-side of this particular single is just 2½ minutes, but it manages to perfectly distil the moment where late (rainy) night loneliness tips over into bitterness and desperation. And what a title too; I’ve never quite decided whether she wants to just drive round to her beau’s house and do something to split him and his wife up, or if she’s actually thinking about smashing shit up. Peebles does the other woman and woman-done-wrong-and-fighting-back better than pretty much anyone. ‘I Will Survive’? pffft, Ann’s gonna break things and tear your playhouse down.
What family traditions have you passed on from your childhood to your own family?
Do you not know? Have you not heard?
Also the camera never stops moving in this clip, which can add a lot of excitement to a scene when it's done with restraint and reason, to compliment the action that's happening. Too many times people just move the camera to move it and the effect becomes tedious or makes you seasick. But I liked the restraint in this clip and I thought the camera was always moving in a way that added to the impact of each moment.
This mother's day, I finally hit the jackpot with a Mac N' Cheese recipe that is the new gold standard - for my boys.
First, find a large rectangular pan and fill it with about an inch of water. This is the classic "water bath" method that is used in cheesecake recipes to enable an even baking throughout the custard.
“Yes, the nurse will take you back. Do you have any questions?”
* = the Cutting Edge-a-thon was unofficial due to the amount of fast-forwarding we engaged in (though that didn’t stop us viewing the special features section of Cutting Edge 2: Going For Gold, which included the lead actress sincerely explaining “It’s the timeless tale of 2 Olympic ice-skaters who fall in love while competing”… the timeless tale so nice they did it thrice… well 4 times now, a new one just came out).
projects, however neat coloring is imperative. All projects must be
There’s no narrative, no hint of Catherine the person, the art critic, the editor – just Catherine M: the set of genitals. And yes, I use the word genitals because it fits the tone of the book – which is utterly clinical and dull. That’s right, DULL. A succession of anonymous penises that all blur into one, a series of unsexy sexual encounters. Yes she does it in the office, in a stairwell, in a flat so seething with filth there’s no room to park her naked bum – but we never get past boring. If the book wasn’t so short I might have given up.
And S. 555 already has 37 co-sponsors in the Senate!
Now you understand why the USA and India are pushing to sensor the Internet and to stop private bloggers from reporting the truth. This is also the reason why they want to curb Facebook and Twitter, because they have lost control over news reporting. They can no longer manipulate the news and they hate it to death.
01 - The Weight
Roaring challenge to the heavens
How do you get through those days where you really don't want to paint, but have to? They don't happen to me a lot, so I really don't have any good advice except it's going to suck and work through it. Does anyone else have something more helpful? I mean, aside from copious amounts of wine or whiskey... :P
Well now a few years later, we have been working very hard to fix our past and build up the current. It’s actually quite difficult but we are working on it.
Since I was very, very young, going back to when I was as innocent and naïve as I’ve ever been, I’ve heard black people called niggers. From the mouth of my father, from the mouth of my mother, from mouths near and far, it came out in every day conversation and without, to my knowledge, there being any actual hatred involved. And no oftener than around my town where not a single nigger lived. And it was somethin’ we all was comfortable with.
well, upon clicking over to her site, i instantly knew i would love what i saw if i browsed around. and i was right! i am very drawn to the look of her images. and i completely love the "double exposure" work she creates. i'm not sure if she is doing true double exposures with her camera or if it is just a superimposing of two photos with editing software the way i did. but either way, i love the results!
Makes about 20 - 2 inch sandwiched cookies.
ENGLISH CLUB MEETING CANCELED
Can you tell which is which? Answer below.
So, it starts already. I can hear myself whinging,
In a Resolution dated July 2, 2002, Graft Investigation Officer I, Joseph L. Licudan, dismissed Borlongan’s complaint for lack of sufficient evidence to warrant a finding of probable cause against respondents, saying, inter alia, thus:
Alexia Reed has been on a major reading jag lately. She’s also been reading a lot of historicals. Since she knows this is what I write and mostly read, she asked,
“I’m . . . seeing someone.”
I got some really good ideas yesterday on that front--more on that soon. And I heard back from Match Prof, who, on Friday, had suggested lunch this week. :-) We've agreed on Thursday. We have a time and are honing in on a place. Yes, I moved my eyelash appointment up to tomorrow evening. And I think I'm going to get a bottle of haircolor and do my roots. I'm still a bit worried about my weight, so feeling the rest of me looks good should help my self-confidence.... Fortunately, my elbow is gradually healing, my voice has been sounding almost normal, and the spot on my nose is fading. I just need to pick an outfit--no doubt some variation on black pants and a colored top.... Yeah, I know I'm putting way more thought into this than usual. But hey, I think this one's in a whole new category!
There is no single Mediterranean diet. Instead, each region across the world, from Spain to the Middle East , customizes the basic diet to take advantage of food availability and cultural preferences.So, if you considering adopting this new diet, it is basically up to you to adjust this diet based on your customs,cultural values and what is best for you.All you need to is to follow the Mediterranean diet pyramid.
So what does this mean?!?!?
Does anybody know if these things really worked?
"Betrayed?" By who?, she didn't add. Too close to what she really needed to know.
Other Half thinks we should just encourage her to tell them to fuck off. While I admire his gung-ho direct approach (and she may need it in the future) she is only 6, so maybe that won't play too well at school...
I planned to get out there this week, but was hit with a whammy of a spring-cold. Once again, working out has been put on hold. Tomorrow, I think I will head out to Fusion Fitness for a change of pace before I jump into my next round of marathon training. We will see how I feel. Right now, I just feel like I am getting flabby...
Don’t you feel loved all over when Papa God throws a few subtle grace notes into the cacophony of your day?
#2. PROBLEM: I work in a variety of locations. So I use a few different technologies. When I’m sitting in the back yard, or at my iMac or at the book store, etc. I have to know what I need to do, I might be able to do it where I lay.
But, my obsession with water buffalo really came out of nowhere. It was as if the minute I stepped off the plane in Hanoi, I had water buffalo on the brain.
Enjoy the rest of your weekend. Oh and I must have dropped some friend links off of the blog roll, if you want to share links let me know and I will get you back in there. Thanks.
This morning Ruby was laying in my bed watching a little video before starting the day. Ruby said, "Mommy, I want you to crap with me."
El-Badri : As long as safety can be guaranteed -- why not?
A Journey Through Beer is a beer blog started up by my son-in-law, the Marine. Simply put, I’d have to say that I think his Journey Through Beer has been interrupted by children. He doesn’t post as often as he’d probably like but he was gracious enough to sign on as a follower to Beer Rant, so I’m just going to have to cut him some slack. In any event, the sorts of trouble I give him on his blog are nothing compared to the grief he gets when he shows up here at Beer Rant HQ. (It’s a father-in-laws prerogative to berate the son-in-law, isn’t it?)
I have not updated my website in 4 years. I actually purchased a new template for my website two years ago. I haven't touched it in over a year. But I am planning on sitting down and really getting it up there soon. :) I need to show all my work from the last four years and all the beautiful new faces of Footprints ®.
I was devastated.
I always see them selling online for around $70.00-$80.00 (and with expensive shipping!). I got this one for $27.00. I think that's a deal! Now I just have to figure out where to put it (and get some succulents I won't immediately kill).
For those who have not noticed this video and others yet, here his a brand new Graveyard song wich remains with their magnum opus sound. Rumours tell that people are going nuts in their live shows with the brand new songs.. leading us to a long waiting for the new record.
Take ds to play park.
- Chocolate canvas lining
Here I'm wearing 2 coats of Essie Glamour Purse + 1 coat of Seche Vite:
The cake was very well received by party-goers, and more importantly, I think the birthday girl really liked it. I sure hope so! We had a great time celebrating with you, A!
articles for Searchlight Magazine and is also listed as both the Charity Correspondent and Secretary of Searchlight
Thus conscience does make cowards of us all;
As a young person I found foreign languages just that F.O.R.E.I.G.N. My Mother spoke German and my Father spoke Finn..and I spoke English. I think my parents preferred it that way..Dad would talk to his brothers in Finn and Mom would talk to her sisters in German..I recall my Mother saying that she felt left out of the Finn conversation..well join the group. I felt left out of all the conversations. I think maybe they did it on purpose so that little ears would not hear adult “stuff.”
None of the current crew was there on that fateful day, but they are well aware of what happened, and of the dangers facing their ship in the Red Sea and the Persian Gulf:
Teenager bent down and looked at the wheel. As soon as he did he began to get all kinds of helpful advice from the crowd.
Due process and the presumption of innocence have also waylaid by these government raiders.
Bobbi
The following candidates need not apply:
Corporations have merged into bizarre conglomerates like AlliedWasteCVSCitigroup, and the concept of privacy has disappeared, as citizens cling to the äppärät, a turbocharged smartphone that broadcasts a constant stream of personal information to and from its users. Shteyngart has drunk deeply at the fire hydrant of popular culture, and his ability to evoke its totems is dazzling. The world of Media (Retail and Credit are the other main occupational categories) features only two television networks --- FoxLiberty-Prime and FoxLiberty-Ultra --- while the paper of record has morphed into the New York Lifestyle Times.
I was born and raised in Australia and for whatever reason I was cursed or blessed with a desire to travel and see the world from a very young age. I travelled as a child with my mother, I travelled as a single girl whenever I could and I travelled often with my husband after I married. I never grew tired of visiting different countries and I harboured a secret longing to live in a far away place one day. But that was all it was a secret longing, a feeling that maybe there was a ‘home’ somewhere else for me that I was yet to discover.
Under the stars she shimmers, all bald head and gracefully bony body, a delicious nakedness that has nothing to do with our current nudity. Out here beneath the night sky her bad girl façade is gone, leaving the meat of her, the brilliant and fragile beauty that enchanted me so completely. Something in what we had done calmed her, allowed her a moment freedom from the defensive shell she’d carried with her all this time.
The inner feeling of the people who deal with your guests should be “I am a salaried employee and it is my personal business that our guests feel home”. The reason why I utilize “salaried” and “business” in that context is that my employees must be aware that if they do not understand guest-hospitality as their business they do not get any salary.
The patterned material is from the Daffadilly Collection by Fabric Central; I used StazOn to stamp the images and colored them with Sharpies before sewing the swatches together on my machine. I did go over all the black with my Copic microliner. I stuffed the bags with cotton stuffing and a bit of catnip.
10/18 – Java Jazz – Houston, TX
- This weekend is costing us a lot of money. I’m okay with that and my husband appears to be as well. Probably because I’m not a big spender. But, I really hope that the experience is worth the money.
She dreams a little, and she feels the dark
INSPIRATION CHALLENGE
We should definitely thank our EU neighbors, at this point, as they have done us a major favour. Though I truly do not see the point of placing Yulia in prison and making her living Mandelesk martyr, instead of stripping her of her ill-gotten fortune and sending her into exile where she would eventually just fade away.
Make that healthy dinner after a nice work out at the gym;
Message in a Bottle (1998)*
An investigation by a Chicago advocacy group found that police officers in the Chicago schools resulted in far too many black juveniles being placed into the criminal justice system too easily and too early. The group, called Project NIA, analyzed Chicago Police Department data and found that 20 percent of all juvenile arrests took place on school grounds.
“There’s no other library like it in the solar system. They said they wanted the best people to work for them, and they picked me, so here we are.”
Coming home really IS the best part of going away. Home Sweet Home. (And another reminder of my Vision and Verb post today.)
Q: Tell us about epiphanic moments in your books. Since you don't outline, how do you make sure these happen?
Lots of my friends had received an email from Amazon saying that one of my (six) vampire novels was published on 1st March. (It wasn't, actually, as they're running a bit late. But no matter.) It looks like a good deal - a nice vampire novel by me for £5.99. Shouldn't I be pleased? No. Because there's no mention from Amazon that it is one of a cycle of six, or that they are novels for teen reluctant readers, so only 8,000 words long.
Nonetheless, I took a cue from the colors of my cakepops to build an outfit for my shoes. This iris blue actually goes with a lot surprisingly- and with Spring around the corner one can easily find candy colored items, especially with cute patterns like flowers and birdies- my fave.
All Music Review by Lindsay Planer: “Hackensack” — a frenetic original composition — opens the disc by demonstrating the bandleader’s strength in a quartet environment. The solid rhythmic support of the trio unfetters Monk into unleashing endless cascades of percussive inflections and intoxicating chord progressions. The title cut also reflects the ability of the four musicians to maintain melodic intricacies that are at times so exigent it seems cruel that Monk would have expected a musician of any caliber to pull them off.
Whenever we are going to be gone for more than 5 days or so, I stop cooking and do a refrigerator clean out. I have to say, cleaning the refrigerator is one of my least favorite household chores so most of the time I try to wipe it down as we go along, but every now and then it needs a good cleaning. As of today it's pretty empty so that will make this disagreeable chore easier, even though I will also use this opportunity to go through all the condiments and miscellaneous jars of stuff that somehow get pushed to the back and die there. In the end I'll be glad I spent the time to do this as it's nice to come home, open it up, and see it sparkling and ready to fill again.
1840-1928
The first one is quite obvious. Indonesian government, like all governments, is a corrupt cesspool of graft and greed. The difference here being that it is thinly veiled and even admitted in casual conversation. No one operates under the illusion that government does anything but take for personal gain. This is in contrast to someplace like America, where the corruption is far deeper and subversive, but there is a carefully crafted veneer of honesty and ‘transparency,’ which is obviously beginning to dissolve.
The big discovery this year is that I am becoming more adventurous in my stitching, especially in making pictures. I've ranted in the past about how I can't draw, and therefore don't try to draw. That's because my taste so far outstrips my capability that it's no fun. But something about drawing with a needle instead of a pencil has freed me from the inner critic. Of course it's crude when you're working with thread in a small space, especially if you use three strands of embroidery floss. So how can I fault myself for crude drawings?
* Pohang University Science & Technology (South Korea)
at first i thought Bono - cos he's a rockstar. and it would be fricken awesome to be Bono for a day - i think. besides the opposite-gender thing. anyways.
"This award is for those bloggers who are nice people - good blog friends and those who inspire good feelings and inspiration. Also for those who are a positive influence on our blogging world. Once you've been awarded, please pass it on to 7 others who you feel are deserving of this award.
Finally for the minority out there including the non Liverpool BNP members who are so vocal on other forums about democracy not being for them, my message is simple, start your own blog up. One that suits your agenda and somewhere where as you have been doing suits your infantile mentality of naming people, our members and also smearing fantastic Liverpool BNP members in the process. To them that do this, you are not true Nationalists but pathetic scum who are worse than the reds. You know who you are we know who you are, loyalty to your friends means nothing to you.
Critics of the evangelical groups have claimed that “reparative therapy” for gay Christians can cause considerable distress and stores up problems for people who suppress their homosexuality and enter into marriages or have children in heterosexual relationships. But the leader of the Core Issues Trust, Mike Davidson, has said: “Homoerotic behaviour is sinful.”
Up and down the South Quire Aisle marched I, neck painfully bent and eyes straining to make out the gloomy arches above. Biblical scenes, saints, sinners, martyrs and tombs aplenty, but no monkey. I was disappointed.
A Day For Daisies has a wonderful new release today --Vintage Halloween! My card features "Vintage Witch" and she's colored with copics. I used Pink Paisley polka dot paper for the background; Fancy Pants paper pack for the sentiment (embellished with orange/black rhinestones from my stash); and I cut the diecut frame using my Cricut and the Happy Hauntings cartridge. I am not certain about the orange striped paper; it is something I've had in my stash for a long time. Last week, ADFD announced their newest challenge - "Gimme Some Texture" - and since I had so much fun adding texture to my project last week, I got a little texture-y this week and added the feathers around the sentiment :)
Anyhoo, I got a post on Korean style, slips and other undergarments, and my fictional BFF planned, so stay tuned. They should appear by the end of this month.
Please check out Gospel for the Mass for the month of February on its own page under the header. I have links to activities, coloring, crafts, games, puzzles, worksheets, quizzes, etc. that can help you with your classroom or at home.
Given their abandonment by the legal system and the antagonism or apathy of most whites, it’s not surprising that blacks took the lead in the quest to end racism. Figures like Harriet Tubman, Frederick Douglass, Sojourner Truth, Booker T. Washington, W. E. B. Dubois, Marcus Garvey, Mary McLeod Bethune, Thurgood Marshall, Constance Baker Motley, Fannie Lou Hamer, and Dr. Martin Luther King, among many others, rose to prominence promoting freedom and equality in their times.
2. Mind Riot
I mumble a vaguely derisive reply and stutter-step my way to the space-suit locker. Upon receiving my customary bright orange rubber suit, I make my way to the airlock.
No worries, Joe. Your boss thinks the Secret Service are just a bunch of knuckleheads. Apparently that whole ‘war on women’ thing only applies to liberal American women…or maybe he slept through that meeting.
So, for just $75 per head (bodies admitted free of charge – Dad Gags, gotta love ‘em) guests will enjoy Chef Richard Smith’s culinary delights, brews from each of the guest brewers, some lively and entertaining banter and some Q & A from the Prof as well as the exclusive company of some of the WORLD’S most respected Beer Champions! How good’s THAT!?!
A little old man looks at all of us and says, “Are all of those your kids?”
MoMA's Portrait of Alfred Flechtheim was gifted to it by Nazi agent Curt Valentin, more on Valentin here.
Noodle Pie provides a fascinating look at emigration, at the role of the emigrant in the lives of those who were left behind and those who are part of their new lives. It is set in Vietnam, with tons of details about Vietnam, its history, its culture, woven naturally into the story. But, it could be true of any emigrant, any country, any time.
Confiture de pommes ( French Apple Jam ).
How do you like to cool off in the summer?
It came about when he had arrived, that he blew the trumpet in the hill country of Ephraim; and the sons of Israel went down with him from the hill country, and he was in front of them.
Have I fallen off the path of trust in Him? Sure have. But, I've actually learned how to remind myself that God is in control and that He's guiding and directing us to a better place. A better place spiritually, financially.
There was a lot of talk just after the riots a few weeks ago that, in a democracy, rioting has no political legitimacy. That is true. But a nation that consistently votes against the type of cuts that are forced on them because the over-ambitious, greedy tossers at the top of the food chain saw an easy way to accumulate a fortune will soon deduce that they don't live in a democracy. Once that tipping point is reached the ideological vacuum that follows can be filled with
In the ebook social network marketing context, a free giveaway is often used but care has to be taken not to devalue the product. Other manifestations are mutual reviews between authors and requests for beta readers.
On the way to Plitvice there is a small Millers village Rastoke usually called “Little Plitvice”. Rastoke is situated at the Slunjcica River estuary which over travertine barriers "dissolves" into the river Korana creating a series of small lakes and picturesque waterfalls. Experience this natural monument compared with famous Fontana di Trevi in 1860 by well known philologist and travel writer Adolf Veber Tkalcevic. Discover the rare symbiosis of fantastic natural creations and centuries old human technical achievements such as old mills from the 17th century.
Don’t Wear Any Underwear: This is always sexy. It’s not totally hygienic, but really sexy things rarely are. Take it from one who knows.
For those of you that have ever done a full marathon combined with a half, you know how happy you are after the half marathoners split off.
I made this enveloppe by myself to go with a great card (to be shown at the review)
Like I mentioned above, these babies store away 120 cd's in each one! Could you imagine the space that 120 movie and video game cases take up? And we have four of these little guys. But of course, they aren't all filled up, we have plenty of room for growth. If I find something I really heart, like in this case, sometimes I buy one or two extra so that when my belongings expand, I am not having to start all over with unmatched bins.
I thought we might have a pleasant discussion about Fernando Torres’ 17-minute hat-trick, but they didn’t seem too bothered about that. They then asked me where I was going.
(This is the "window of truth", where you can view the straw and chicken wire that insulate it behind the thick layers of stucco.)
The atmosphere is bohemian and eclectic. The narrow, walk-down space is lined on either side with small wooden tables. (Don't let them seat you upstairs; it's lonely and not as charming.) The mood is convivial. You won't find tourists here, for the most part. Patrons are either cost-conscious, dyed-in-the-wool New Yorker or displaced Europeans. You'll hear a lot of French spoken, usually by older people who have obviously been there many times and know the waiters by name. The food is very good, but never great. People don't come here for the menu, but the familiar, cozy feeling. It's always packed, so there's always an air of celebration in the place.
A selection of refreshing pubtails are offered at $6 during Happy Hour, which are regularly $10-$12. I'm partial to The Westside - a mojito-inspired drink made with gin, watermelon, mint, and lemonade. My friend, who recently returned from a trip to Italy with a newfound love for Aperol - was delighted to find that Waterloo & City is one of the few places that serve the liquor in L.A., in the form of Aperol Spritz - a pubtail consisting of Aperol, sparkling wine, club soda, and orange. Wine and beer of the day are also available for $5 or $4, respectively. You can also order well drinks for $5 during Happy Hour.
ESHEBA FROM ASHTAR COMMAND SAYS: Heaven has decided officially that it will not be long before we fill your skies for the time is now truly at hand.
The bean itself started out as black shrink plastic cut in 2 inch bean shapes. Once heated and shrunk to less than an inch, I added coppery brown embossing powder, and heated until several layers made a thick finish. Burnt my fingers more than once, I never learn, that stuff gets hot.
I have posted about my top books of 2011 in a variety of places, not least of which is this blog itself. While I could talk about those books a LOT, I don't want to sound like a broken record, so I'm going to switch up the prompt a little. My apologies to our fearless leader, Sarah Enni. I will bake you something to make up for it.
Solar in Spring – Summer – Fall, wind supplemental at these times.
Krista
I tried to hide my feelings
"Billy said they stick out, but I don't think so." She is still looking in the mirror, holding her hair half up and turning her head back and forth to check them out.
And hopefully I'll be over the stupid number.
I find that the gratitude in my heart strangles out the anger, fear and pain that creeps in. There is just no room for it. As I type these words a sense of peace quenches my soul, proof to me of God’s true love.
The next few days I will not be anywhere near a computer because I will be playing hostess to my best friend. I started that yesterday by running to Simply Cupcakes, an amazing cupcake bakery here in town, to pick up a dozen delicious cupcakes as a welcoming treat to my favorite couple.
Firstly it doesn't use cornflour like some and hence for a bull a gate kind of gal like me there is far less chance of lumpiness.
4. Sam's shared romantic screen time with Anne Archer, Vera Miles, Cher AND Kirstie Alley. Jealous?
Born to Run
The original It Girl and Betty Boop inspiration, Clara Bow was one of the biggest movie stars of the 1920s. In 1931, a tabloid newspaper spread vicious rumours as part of a blackmail attempt, starting a number of lingering urban myths about her sex life. The publisher was arrested and sentenced to eight years in jail. Bow retired from acting in 1933 and became a rancher in Nevada.
Stormfather! This woman was the sister of a king.
Our nightly schedule this week:
We all need to have these weird and wonderful ideas, whether they work or not. How many funny anecdotes can you think of where you haven’t thought something through properly and it’s ended up in a mess? Derek might have been a catastrophe but I’ll always have a smile when I picture him buggering people’s legs in the park.
10. Mouth's Cradle - Björk, Choir & Mark Bell
May 13, 2012 @ 2pm
The boy crossed the river and I heard a baby’s cry and he disappeared.
Unfortunately my treatment has not worked out as I hoped. So I am giving this letter to my partner Olivia to share with you in the circumstance in which I cannot continue.
Once you have figured out your operating costs you must then “hit the bricks” and start cold calling on potential sponsors. Start with smaller mom and pop type companies, show them how and why going with you will help their businesses. Be creative in your pricing and programs so you will have a solution for every opposition you get. Once you have secured a few pre production sponsors it is time to take the leap and get a airtime contract. Get your show up and running and do things to prove your viewership. For instance drive people to your website and have a place for them to login to capture their emails and names that way you have something to show some of the bigger companies.
Perhaps the dream of getting something for nothing is merely wishful thinking. But maybe if I act now, I can still get that deal on those Sprites.
The thing is, fanboys are also very VERY defensive about their loves when it comes to just what they are fanboys about. Say something wrong, something ill-informed, something completely off the subject of what they think or believe and, brother, they'll call you on it right then and there. There have been some heated, intense and pretty darned violent confrontations between fanboys and...well, let's just call them Regular People. You'd never believe that a plastic light saber could hurt so much.
Arthur didn't cope with war as well as Percy. In the end Percy was wiser than Arthur, who had ideals and a strict moral code. The qaugmire of that war broke him. Percy, more realistic perhaps, came out of that dirty little war with his sanity intact, even if his faith in humanity reduced.
I remembered being so moved by the tragic accounts of Hurricane Katrina’s victims not so long before. I guess part of me expected the victims of Tohoku to express their grief and loss in the same way. To be open about their feelings and thoughts and want to share their story for all to hear so that help would come quick. But I learned something about the Japanese people, or rather, re-learned. And that is the fact that the Japanese people are different from you and me. Americans and Japanese live in different worlds and are raised in different ways. As such, even the way we respond to such devastating loss is not the same. And consequently, I could not find many willing to be interviewed. As Japan Times journalist Davinder Kumar put it, “…the survivors rarely speak out and, least of all, complain about their circumstances. To be seen needing help is a dent in one’s self-respect and seeking it is akin to a betrayal of those who need it more.”
I spent the past week interviewing with a few companies. I think I did well but I’m still trying to find that perfect job. It has been a long process but with my luck the way it has been, it’s possible I’ll finally find something sooner.
Soy Sauce- 1 Tbsp
What this country urgently needs is not redistributive politics or statist economic planning. Since economic and political realities now show us the ill effects of Big Government, protectionism, and regulations, we need to revise or reform the Constitution to pave the way for important political and economic changes we urgently need to survive as a nation. We need to scrap protectionism, economic regulations, welfare programs, and other destructive taxes. Free market system, not statism, is the only solution to our national predicament. However, it appears that the current administration is averse to proper constitutional reform. Based on the composition of its economic team and advisers, this Yellow regime is not in favor of free market reforms, but of more government intervention and statism.
What started your interest in organ as a kid?
So, the rules...well, it's only one rule, but I think it's a pretty great rule.
They were trying to protect me......... to take care of their own.........
Analysis: If Blackmon is available they take him, no question, no surprise. If he’s not the Rams are left with a choice. If Morris Claiborne is still available he makes sense to play opposite Cortland Finnegan, there’s also any number of other receivers available, but I could also see St. Louis making a move to upgrade the O-Line. They grab Martin at 6 let Sam Bradford breathe a little easier and pick up a new target for him in the 2nd.
One thing that this study proves is that through the use of nonlinear time series analysis, randomness in the EEG tracings can be quantified.
Oh – and did I mention that these spots itch with the ferocity of a million fire ant bites?
A few days later, I remembered, and glanced in my closet. No polka dots. Not a one. Seriously. How do I have 13 striped shirts and not one polka-dotted one?
* 1/4 cup fresh cilantro leaves
These hotspots are spread throughout the world’s continents with the exception of Antarctica.
Seeing this for the first time, I thought the crew coming in was some white-power special task force with the red/white/blue color scheme and the KKK spelled across the front of the three bikes. Bill from Outside The Cinema has since informed me that they are just Kawasaki bikes, and the K is just the logo. Heh...
BE INFORMED THAT I HAVE RESOLVED WITH THE NIGERIA PRESIDENCY TO DELIVER THE SUM OF US$2.5M BEING THE INTEREST FUND ACCRUED FROM YOUR CONTRACT/INHERITANCE AND COMPENSATION FUND.
What’s that? I CAN’T HEAR YOU!
Then it was time to deliver the puppy (we called him Little Guy since he didn't have a name yet), and head to my grandmother's (on my moms side of the family) for Christmas dinner. In some ways, I was very sad to see Little Guy go. We bonded the most out of my family, he slept on my bed, slept in my lap, played with me, and chewed on my ear. But in other ways, I wasn't so sad. No more constantly following him around and prying inedible things out of his mouth; no more keeping him away from Winston, who did NOT like him; no more remembering to bring him outside every hour so he wouldn't pee on the floor; no more struggling to get his needle-sharp teeth out of my favourite knit sweater... You get the idea. ;-)
This is my $20.00 easel, and my plastic art storage stand that holds my pastels. I live in a very small house and do not have a studio space, so when I want to draw, I just pull up a chair to my easel and work. When I am not using it, it is flush with the wall.
A: Two. One to change it and another to blame America for the burnt bulb.
This morning, I woke up to Serena being soaking wet. Luckily, Luke got her out of her clothes while I got the little one all changed & ready for her busy morning.
arbitrary
Snoop - 40
R3: *Sc 1, 2 sc in next sc*, rep 6 times. (18 sts)
Lt. Col. Canfield D. Boone, 54, Clifton, Va.
Not to mention the threats of bonuses and raises, which NEVER materialize.
I plan to help my fellow men - not call them names you fucking pieces of cow shit.
The 1988 is the successor to the World`s Best Whisky award winning Yoichi 1987, so demand is sure to be hotter than a plastic car seat in August. As with all the others in this series, which is always released at this time of the year, it is a 20-year-old whisky (the age people are considered to come of age in Japan and, perhaps more relevantly, the drinking age).
I believe in God, the Father almighty, Creator of heaven and earth, and in Jesus Christ, his only Son, our Lord, who was conceived by the Holy Spirit, born of the Virgin Mary, suffered under Pontius Pilate, was crucified, died and was buried; he descended into hell; on the third day he rose again from the dead; he ascended into heaven, and is seated at the right hand of God the Father almighty; from there he will come to judge the living and the dead.
I am looking forward to reading the rest of the series.
This is the way to achieve liberty for the Nation of Israel and for the world. One person is not slave to another, but we are all servants of G-d. The first of those servants is the human king of Israel whose entire purpose is to fulfill the destiny of the Nation of Israel: to perfect the world in the Kingdom of Heaven.
- 2 pairs of heavy socks in a dragoney color
Let us break down this description then.
Got these little millefiori eggs over the summer at a bead sale, not really my style but I like the way they turned out with these funky little ruffled flower beadcaps and antiqued earwires:
Today’s post is by Jubilant Julie, a faithful participant of the Walking and Stair Stepping Challenge. A talented writer, fearless adventurer of new things, and a fellow traveler on the road to change; she has graciously agreed to be a guest poster.
I plan to have them either reupholstered or perhaps slipcovered in a linen like fabric.
So what are these log file sequential reads all about?
Today’s text message:
1415 D-III/1/2002. “ ‘Is This So’? Stephen Protomartyrus and the Bibles We Have Known.” First Friday Lecture Series, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois.
Schenker MB, Gold EB, Beaumont JJ, Eskenazi B, Hammond SK, Lasley BL, McCurdy SA, Samuels SJ, Saiki CL, Swan SH. Association of spontaneous abortion and other reproductive effects with work in the semiconductor industry. Am J Ind Med 1995; 28: 639-659.
I simply bought this pre-made shadow box at Michael's craft store and replaced the dark velvet backing with some of my yellow scrap upholstery fabric. I then mounted two sterling spoons that were gifted to the bambino. Voila!
I liked the change in floor set up! Big hall-o-beers; Side bar and Birds nest. Plenty of room and tables. Temperature seemed to fluctuate more. Cold spots and hot spots but never a comfortable spot. Don't see purpose of VIP entry! Go early! Place was crowded but lines were short. That damn smell of Candied nuts are still running through my nose... Damn them! If all my reviews states, 'Smell like Cinnamon and Nuts." You'd know why!
Since we got all that out of the way, on to this weeks challenge. We would like you to create something small, because Good things Come in Small Packages! What we mean by that are small boxes or small cards. The cards that I created today are 4x4. You know what I love about small cards, they are sooooo easy to put together. Once colored these took me minutes to throw together.
Once John and I arrived in Heerenveen and met up with my family, we were on a mission. One of our (or at least my) top vacation desires in the Netherlands was to visit a windmill, and the one that’s right in the middle of Heerenveen is open Saturday mornings only, so for us it was then or never.
Dec 04, 2011 - 10:30 AM ET/PT
Make sure you check out the SP Blog to see what Samantha did with the new stamps! We also have the Stamp Team and the Challenge Team teaming up today to show you lots of amazing projects with the newest stamp sets!
Not only is Amy super talented in interior design, but her career now is in bespoke stationary and it is truly stunning as well. I want to get married all over again just to have her do my invites.
was my inspiration
Finally, just when I had walked through so many overpriced antique shops I wanted to quit, we stopped at a light store. By this point I was researching new chandeliers and had given up on the whole antique thing all together. So we stopped at the light store.
These are complicated, interwoven issues. As a writer, the biggest thing under our control is the product/story we put out there. Everything about the words on the page are under the control of the self-published writer. You don’t have to answer to anyone. This is both boon and bane. There is the danger in being your own boss to assume, that because the product is yours, that you always know what is best for it. This isn’t true in the business world and it isn’t in books either. As with all creative works, the artist is often too close to it to see potential flaws. This is why editing, copy-editing, cover artists, and the like are so important. Sometimes people with knowledge and experience in your field have expertise and a viewpoint that are better than your own. To not use or ignore them results in a poor product.
- lunch: no lunch (only in weekend, but in weekends I have a higher calorie needs)
as the post-vacation high wears off,
1. God views Israel’s association to the land as a fact of profound importance
I must say I had a bad experience to begin with: I downloaded a PDF I needed for research, and it was hopeless: when the screen showed the whole page, the print was impossibly tiny, and zooming in gave me a frustrating section of a page only, whereas if there was one thing I needed to do with this document, which was the report of a tribunal, it was scan whole pages and skip. I ended up printing out the whole hundred A4 pages, which gave me the chance physically to divide it all up, and put together the sections I really needed, and mark bits with different coloured highlighters according to order of importance. Well, that was a PDF, but then when I came to download a novel next, I discovered that that ability to skip back and forth is crucial to my reading of novels, and it wasn't so easy on a Kindle. Get to a point in a novel which refers you back to an earlier moment which you then want to glance at again quickly, and with a paper book you can usually do it in an instant by remembering how far the book was physically open at the time. Try that on a Kindle, and you're pressing one button after another, and your reading experience is suspended and clotted... And I know some people think it's sacrilege, but I like to scribble copious notes in the margins at top speed...
so, thinking about it I am not too sure WHY we torture ourselves
For those of you unfamiliar with “paleo” nutrition, I highly recommend doing some research on it. A great resource for this way of eating is The Paleo Solution, by Robb Wolf. Not only does Robb outline the benefits of paleo nutrition, he also provides a simple, easy-to-follow and easy-to-prepare 30-day meal plan — its doesn’t get much better than that!
77 1. “Retreat from Politics: Greece, 1967.” Massachusetts Review, vol. 9, pp. 83-113 (1968) (errata noted, Spring 1968 issue, p. 206; many additional corrections are needed). See Item D-V/30/1968, below. See, also, Item D-XII/31/1993, below. Reprinted in Congressional Record, vol. 115, pp. 8461-8468; Daily Record, pp. E2632-E2639 (April 2, 1969).
I've had travel on the brain lately (let's be honest, I ALWAYS have travel on the brain). Mr. C and I have a list of places we want to go and that list grows every.single.day. Real life tends to get in the way of our dreams of being gypsies, so I often find myself in la la land imagining myself in the gorgeous places I see and dreaming what I would be like if I lived there. So when I saw this stop.in.your.tracks colorful facade, I obviously planned out my entire life as a tenant of this pretty place...wait, you don't do that?
The multinationals, the Indian government, and international NGOs work in cosy collaboration, supported by agencies like Britain’s Department of International Development for whom both Odisha and Chhattisgarh are “focus states.” The aluminium company Vedanta is an example. It has been engaged in an epic battle with the indigenous Dongria Kondh communities in the Niyamgiri hills of Odisha over the destruction of thousands of acres of fertile agricultural land in a region which has seen famines every year since 2007. Drinking water sources have been contaminated by its dumping of fly ash and toxic red mud into river streams, and thousands of indigenous people have been displaced.
Now, here’s where I made my mistake. Even though our evening plans had changed, my Mexican food craving never left me. Naturally, I had the bright idea of getting sports-stadium quality nachos for dinner. Smart, right? Not only were they gross, they were also expensive, so I felt like I had to eat them. Needless to say, my stomach has been upset ever since.
Don’t drop the ball! Keep it in play!
Besides stirring the pot and keeping it simmering, these comrades are also actively involved in many other shady dealings going on behind the scenes, dealings that will make your hair stand on end if the truth is ever revealed, which of course happens very seldom, as these slimy serpents are masters of deception. The only time they will allow ‘truth’ to be revealed is when it suits their agenda.
“I love them all equally,” she says, “You know, just like your mother tells you she love all of you, all your brothers and sisters the same - like yeah…Whatever! So yeah, I love them all equally, because, like, you know, I don’t want any of them to get upset.”
1.) They must be online and free.
Hot dogs and broccoli
2010.08.17 Russia North Ossetia 2 23 Two people are dead and twenty-three others injured in a suicide attack and separate cafe bombing.
Pavarti K Tyler is an artist, wife, mother and number cruncher. She graduated Smith College in 1999 with a degree in Theatre. After graduation, she moved to New York, where she worked as a Dramaturge, Assistant Director and Production Manager on productions both on and off Broadway.
On the pitch, where the true test of any manager is fought, Mancini has also out-smarted Ferguson: 7-1 is the aggregate score of this season’s two league derbies. The memory of the 6-1 caning handed out to Unite d in their own backyard in October cowed Ferguson into a defensive 4-5-1 that featured Park Ji-sung – who had not featured since 15 March – alongside the creaking trio of Michael Carrick, Ryan Giggs and Paul Scholes (combined age 105), and Nani – whose ability to track back is not mentioned on his CV – in a loaded midfield designed to smother City.
But I was so wrong.
Sit back and relax and let her take you away.
Think of your friends and family and all the complexities of their characters. Think of all their nuances and traits. It would be difficult just to sum all of that up into a simple category. Most people fit across several. People will even wander in and out of roles throughout their life. Give your characters the same complexity.
the twisted wire gleams
will be e-mailed to you ASAP, or within few hours.
The Immigration (Amendment)(No. 5) Bill, 2011 also creates a separate immigration category for foreigners who have maintained a “substantial business presence” in the Cayman Islands and for visiting business people.
You can order a regular sized cup for 85php and a large size for 115php (if my memory serves me right). We usually just get the regular cup. For the topping, there are a lot to choose from and my favorites are the hazel nuts and choco drops! If you decide to just have 1 topping, that’s 20php on top of the basic yogurt price, if 2 toppings that’s 35php and if 4, that’s 45php.
I was deeply disturbed by this chain of events and by our apparent inability to change the presumptions behind the campaign and come back with a more progressive response and a narrative that would work.
Dark matter. It's one of the great mysteries in cosmology.
"I Am Your": Computer generated -- I used the corner of a square punch to get the banner notch on the end
I’m sitting now at my computer desk, readying documents for the labour court because I was wronged. I tried to settle things nicely with my company. I tried to meet them half way, even though I was not in the wrong. I went on Monday to the county courthouse and was advised to go to the labour court tomorrow because it was crystal clear that my work has acted illegally by withholding my pay for the last month. I can only say that I am glad that it was so crystal clear that my work is in the wrong, otherwise I wouldn’t know where to even begin pursuing my money owed. I can only hope that the labour court sees it exactly as clear as I do, and when not, that my lawyer an Friday will.
Republicans/conservatives:
Be by soon to say Hi
Nevertheless the troublesome rumours still persisted. Saif meanwhile was successful in his application for political asylum and disappeared from the scene.
Or, the most adventurous explanation, but one which, as we have seen, is given in 19th century sources and congruent with what we know about the English ale of the time, it was called “oil” because it was so strong, thick and viscous. My guess is that it originated as a misspelling, which grew popular because the resulting expression sounded amusing and appropriate.
Former manager Allardyce was on a reported £1.25 million a year when Venky’s took over. As his replacement they appointed Steve Kean, a man with no prior experience of managing a football club, on a reported £350,000 a year. That’s a £900,000 a year saving.
What’s written in the picture:
Lo and behold! Benjamin stopped screaming immediately and he looked at me. I couldn’t have gotten a better result if I put ‘In the name of Jesus’ in front of my declaration.
I couldn't be constant about posting and I always prefer to make the funny (for me) Sunday posts as soon as I have few minutes of free time. Totally Random Sunday posts could stay here in this blog in case you don't want them in your blog, no problems at all for this. I'd like to be incorporated in another blog bigger and more organized than mine: I can produce photos, edit them and write my reviews or comments or fun facts, then the "boss blogger" can change and correct my texts and post everything when she prefers. She could even picks up my old posts and repost them in a way and in a timing she likes. In this way I could continue to do my hobby, that give me relax and allows to vent myself in a creative way.
We’re there to inform them of what their rights are, what the law is, engage discussion with them and ultimately learn from them. And they’re there to learn a bit about the law, tell us how the law actually is applied through their own experiences, and engage in discussion with us and each other. For me, one of the the most difficult but important parts of going there every Sunday is hearing the (pre-incarceration) experiences of the young men there and their thoughts on the law and how it is applied.
Jennifer Egan visited Carlisle a few weeks ago, and read the first chapter of her Pulitzer-winner, A Visit From the Goon Squad. I was thrilled she came to town. I don't know how Dickinson manages to book such amazing authors as her, Ian McEwan and Margaret Atwood, among others. And to make the events free to the public (exactly what I can afford).
All three tales revolve around powerful female figures who are halfway between witches and goddesses. Once the maiden confronts the witch, she will never be the same again. She is utterly transformed. She comes into her true powers. As these tales weave themselves into the fabric of Kathrin's life, she claims her powers and true identity.
Here we are at Jack & Bridgeys Birthday Party at the Verdict!
Had my work buddy (who was nominated to be the representative of our department for this year's charity breakfast event) not been persuading me to participate, I would have just gave it a miss this year.
In a medium bowl cream the butter and add the cheese. Add the flour and salt. Mix well. Blend in the nuts. The dough should be a smooth consistency.
Just because we are ‘everyday folks’ doesn’t mean we can’t help, she says.
Total: 48.04
Good News Everyone!
Anyway, the story starts out in the year 1969 where young agent K was killed by a criminal alien, therefore altering the timeline. Agen J akhirnya ditugasin buat kembali ke tahun 1969 buat nyelametin agen K dari kematiannya, yang ternyata dengan menyelamatkan agen K, agen J bahkan ngga cuman menyelametin dirinya sendiri, tapi juga seluruh dunia
When you're behind a computer you don't have to do any of that, so how annoying can it really be?
Document entered regarding SS number assigned to Obama. SS number is not verified under E Verify. It comes back as suspected fraudulent. This is the system by which the Government verifies ones citizenship.
Lisa just laughs and holds up the sweet for me to read its tiny writing -
He did, but not without a promise.
But that is more than a quarter of a century.
Understand a mosh pit. Mosh pit might seem cool and might look rock and roll but seriously, I would only do it if i was high out of my mind and thought I was flying closer to the friendly purple koala in the sky that wants me to follow him. People get very seriously hurt crowd surfing or even just trying to get a closer look at the band. This past festival had one particularly nasty example – a guy completely obliterated his ankle crowd surfing (was probably dropped) and his ankle was shattered, bloody and floppy…three things that I don’t want my ankle ever described as. Basically, don’t do it unless you know what you are getting yourself into.
“Who commands the Grail?” he demanded.
I wasn't sure what she meant at first, because it's not a thing you can just understand out of context, but then I looked at my car and noted that the notorious Obama/Biden sticker was GONE.
wish ur interest
As for the opinion, I’ll just say it’s everyones own business. Me, I’m crazy enough as it is, put me on drugs and the whole world will go insane.
Poor time management is often due to:
It is a minor compulsion and I control it. It does not control me.
I could tell he liked the music, but apparently Adele and Stevie Wonder do not inspire my little man to stand on his head. (Which, really, why would this shock me?) I should try Madonna's early stuff perhaps. Fairly proven, I'd guess.
It's not just poop that we're uncomfortable with. We're also uncomfortable with body hair, body fat, breast-feeding, puberty, periods, digestive sounds, nudity, and pretty much anything else that involves natural body processes. Even Adam and Eve felt compelled to cover themselves with fig leaves. Why are our bodies so embarrassing?
comrade—not a tear, not a word,
Holtzhausen said his daughter Monya, her partner Quintin Steyn, 23, and their 2-year-old son were attacked on a smallholding near Estoire outside Bloemfontein at about 03:00 on Friday.
More important, a short bibliography of helpful and supporting articles (available online, from academic databases and websites).
They communicate the way we do - by means of whispering.
Acts 27:3
The second one is my winning entry =) from last week´s Lily´s Friday Prediction:
How are we to relate to these folks?
1 mistake
Judge Smith, then Chris Smith, as PH announced.
Reason #4 -- Religious beliefs make some people one-issue voters, or at least one-group voters. Otherwise, Sarah Palin, who is way out of her league, wouldn’t have energized so many people. They’re obviously not looking at her as a real leader: she’s a prom queen who happens to believe in a specific set of religious tenets. Perhaps there is this fanatical fantasy about turning the U.S. into some sort of idealistic Christian wet dream…never mind that this country was founded largely on religious tolerance and separation of church and state. The Republicans have pandered to the social right-wing of the party, which is as out-of-touch with the country at large as the social left-wing was in the late 70s and early 80s. The pendulum has swung, but a quarter of the country hasn't noticed and instead is frothing at the mouth at the possibility of fundamental Christianity as the law of the land.
Okay. So moving on…
Bride was a huge bestseller. Huge. Women read it under their duvet covers. Men read it on commuter trains, where they hid it behind a big hard Hemingway hardback. Even grandmothers were seen sneaking into libraries and borrowing it out with their copies of Danielle Steel. It was dubbed as "an intelligent and accomplished exploration of female sexuality". Exploration was right. There was a scene with taxi drivers that was so revelatory, it made me question what cabbies do when they're not, er, picking up rides.
Here he speaks seriously of the possibility of the “end of the world,” based on his observations that it is impossible for men to live long without deep spiritual roots, which have been uprooted in the East by Communism and in the West by worldly humanism.
My heart goes out to women of reproductive age who don't have money or resources. May they somehow miraculously prevail!
Pescarolo later made the following comments to Endurance-info:
When I asked her why it was old fashioned, she told me it was because of the nose. So let me get this straight – just because teenagers are too lazy to make a dash for a nose, they decide to tell everyone that it’s not cool? Brilliant. I plan on implementing the same strategy with my family’s dirty laundry – I’ll tell my children that cool kids don’t wear clean clothes anymore. Maybe if I roll my eyes and look at them like they’re stupid for wanting to wear clean underwear, they’ll believe me.
On the other hand, the current tv in our living room is a 21″ flat screen (really flat, 20th century TV!) which looked a little too small for the TV stand and the entire living room itself so the only sensible solution is to switch the TVs haha!
I thought I was strong
Hated even the core of myself
As a long time cyclist, one must bow to the power and occasional weather fickleness of Mother Nature. I am not a mountain biker, spin jumping among forests and hills. But inevitably, there is a noticeable difference between cycling surrounded by only cars and buildings versus on paths with nearby forest, mountains, fields and bush in sight. Even cultivated garden plots here and there along the way, count for visual relief.
I was pleased with myself for all the purging and cleaning until I read Sara Noel’s Frugal Living column in my local paper and this statement sent me running back to my cupboard: McCormick’s website states that if their spices are in a tin can, they are at least 15 years old.
Jack (7 years 5 months): Returning to the table with his full plate from a buffet brunch serving line, Jack grumbled, “They’re out of bacon.” (#412)
But, let’s face it, God in the Old Testament is not just vengeful, he is unfair.
These gardens and views are my favourite place and 'I Wish I Was Here...'
as beautiful as the sound of the mystery of yesteryear
PV: You have two more EPS coming out this year. If each of these EPs could say one thing, what would they say?
No one knew me, no one knew me
-that a coat hanger will not clear a stucco clog
In 'Joga', Björk summed up her new sound with the lyric "emotional landscapes". Homogenic's massive distorted beats sound geological, like continental plates shearing against each other. It evokes Iceland as the Earth's foundry, the (c)ore beneath the crust. "I was trying to refer to the lava and volcanoes with those sounds. There's nothing pretty about Icelandic nature, it's very stark. Homogenic is a warrior album – with a heart, not weapons."
Final Exam . . . 25%
A Chinese imperial edict of about 1,100 B.C. makes it clear that the use of alcohol in moderation was believed to be prescribed by heaven.
(The Roman poet Martial teases a well-known citizen for loitering in the public latrines in hope of a dinner invitation.)
In cursive, in cowardice, in reverent scrawl
But then the sermon bumper starts, and its a song by Gungor that I’ve never heard before and the lyrics are on the screen:
Do not give up and do not give in,
that you blend fastest with a city,
Anyway, we were definitely super appreciative for the break, and I'm sure it's good for Henry to get used to hanging out with people that aren't me. He sometimes has a bit of a whinge when I pass him over to anyone else, but it's not really affecting our daily life in any negative way... Yet.
Of course not and what needs to be remembered is that in any market there are going to be winners and losers.
Before you were born all of my friends with boys would tell me there is something special about a little boy and I have to agree! I love you and your sister equally but the way you respond only to me and how sweetly you snuggle with me just makes me feel like I am your girl. :) Let's keep it that way till you are at least 16, ok? I know you will grow up to be such a gentleman and will steal some girl's heart like you have stolen mine. Your daddy and I promise to love you unconditionally and to raise you to the very best of our ability.We love you precious Connor!!
Soooo... As I horde bitz for the chaos dwarf project to continue I thought I would do something novel and try and finish an army. Conquest in coming up Easter Weekend and Rumble in the Bronx is slated for the week after (both during my school holidays so I will theoretically have some more time to hobby). I got to talking with friends and thinking things through. I will finish my Orcs and Goblins army for both and move onto the Chaos Dwarves for Empire in Flames later in the year.
In the first article of this series, it was stated that any covenantal system, to be Biblical, must reflect three characteristics, all begin­ning with the letter ‘T’. So far we’ve looked at two of these, transition and transference.
They either saw or heard me. Or both. Hell, maybe they smelled me. I was, after all, on the top of their menu.
I am so blessed.
Dear Sunday,
Accessories: epoxy glitter circle stickers
There are many more amazing creation apps out there. I will continue to explores these in future Whetting Your APPetite volumes, and welcome readers to share their favorites in the comments section.
I can’t forget my boots…even though they’ll only be in the closet for a few more weeks. They’re getting stored behind the pants & cardis. One side for brown, one side for black. And yes, I have THAT MANY pairs of boots. I think I have about 8 pair….or maybe more.
Dinner in Dublin
Finally, from a dynamic point of view, the Granger-Causality
I'm a real fan of the bees wax finish as I have found that if the ring has any little scratches on it from regular wear, a quick reapplication of bees wax easily covers any imperfections. I love to test-drive all of our products before listing so that I know that you will love yours as much as I do.
I would suggest a drinking game for the imbibers where you take a sip every time Bella's gaze drops below the horizon level, but I'm fairly sure you'd get alcohol poisoning before the final credits rolled.
Virtually any absorbent cotton/cotton blend material will work. You can use brand new materials or recycle those you find around your house or local thrift store. Here are some of our favorites.
The little sentiment is craft work cards.
And when he could read, we lost him
When people talk about art though, they tend to reflect on their favorite artists rather than examining how or why their art is meaningful. Let's take a moment to look at the three things most often depicted in D&D: monsters, characters, and dungeons.
will cease
If you have been reading my blog from the start you know that my Faith is everything to me. I believe in my Faith when I am down, when I am happy, when I am troubled and in every aspect of my life. I know that my Faith never goes unnoticed even when my journey is in the toughest times. Sometimes it is hard to be thankful and grateful for all you already have when you may feel that you need so much. Maybe if you have an ongoing struggle or tough situation it is easier to think negative thoughts and say negative things instead of being positive. But I am going to tell you seeing things in a negative way will get you no where. If you are always being negative you will never be successful and achieve your dreams. But if you were to do the opposite you will often see how wonderful your life really is and will be able to be thankful for all you have.
My dad took me to the Saturday showing, which I insisted on going to, because it was Rocky Horror, and there were only two showings.
now let's get those photos moving!
Me: And written across it, "Tucsonian '83!"
You know best. The most valuable advice you can provide to aspiring writers is your own experience as a road map for them to follow. What was it that was the key to your success? Persistence? Networking? Building a portfolio? Filling a niche? Pure writing talent? Luck? Whatever it was, drill that point into every aspiring writer’s head. As a bonus, belittle whatever efforts the aspiring writer has already made. Clearly whatever they’re doing isn’t working, otherwise they wouldn’t be reading your advice in the first place. If they say they’re already doing what you advise, they’re just not doing it hard enough, so belittle them for that instead.
A stadium full of English fans supporting a team of English players led by an English manager is surely the recipe for success, and the English FA – as well as any other FA looking to appoint a new manager – should make use of said recipe if they are to achieve anything as a football nation.
Scarlet Thread just can't keep up with the new arrivals from Laura Perin these days. Our latest are a couple of fun, quick stitches.
watercolor and pencil
This brings me to today’s Smoothie…
c) A personal insignia? Really?
It is a fabulous place! New England has some of my very favorite string joints--Halcyon (Bath, ME), The Fiber Studio (Henniker, NH), Harrisville Designs (Harrisville, NH) are three that I love. I've not yet made it to Bartlettyarns in Harmony, ME, but that's next on the list. Don't waste your time going to Patternworks in Center Harbor, NH. It's really just a glorified LYS and there's nothing terribly special to buy, although the building is lovely. Jimmy and I used to vacation in Center Harbor back in the '90s because it's right on Lake Winnipesaukee, so go there for that.
I wouldn’t like to be in the minister’s shoes now that she’s revealed the chink in her armour. Australia is a nation renowned for its uncouth and vulgar jesters. If any of these pranksters see her in a restaurant, they won’t hesitate to put a saucer of milk on her table. Whenever she appears in public, she’ll have to listen to larrikins making pussy-pussy noises or telling her to lick her whiskers. She may as well wear a Catwoman costume to pre-empt all the jibes she’s going to face.
I know that somewhere within the "rules" of blogging, one is that you don't apologize when you haven't been around much.
Asked to confirm whether her department had "absolutely no estimate" of the number of illegal immigrants, Dlamini-Zuma said the only figures she could offer were those of asylum seekers.
Play count
The ancient Greeks already had prototype steam engines and mechanical computers. Had the Church not killed Alexandrian science, we could have the Industrial revolution 1,000 years before James Watt.
She left the web, she left the loom,
Some babe's talkin' real loud
Q: You had a few battles on the way?
The bad thing about Harry Potter World is this:
by Kay Rice
“It is game of perception…in this case, the opposition has won in creating doubts on Najib’s credibility even if it is not the truth ,” said Ramli.
A silent flute
can make a huge difference. Perhaps you need a little more information
8 € which includes one drink
== Is experience in government relevant? ==
Tel: 03-2201-2893
1. I had my last "planning meeting" with my contractor yesterday! Which means that I have everything I need to take to the bank to get this party started. It has been SUCH a long process, this planning stage. Mostly that's my fault, because I've made a gazillion changes since the first draft. I have a super-patient contractor, though, who has yet to fire me.
Okay, here's the example I was leading up to: Agents constantly TELL us how subjective the business is, but to be honest, we're not always SHOWN that. Look at the way querying is structured. Agents don't have nearly enough time to give each rejected writer a personalized response, which means we get either 'yes' or 'no.' We count up stats and look at numbers. We say, "This person got a 43% request rate: this is a "good" query." Our secret, inner question: How subjective can it be when "good" queries lead to requests and representation and "bad" queries don't?
I noticed Sunday morning, hot cup of coffee in hand, looking out the kitchen window, that the trees are just starting to show signs of buds. Can winter be over? Can it be that I survived yet another season without TBHITW?
The MHS Middie Reader Book Club is now offering advice for any student who is not sure what book to read next. Check out our new review site here by clicking here!
Guy's not big on emotion, but I like to think he appreciates my enthusiasm. As much as anyone appreciates the enthusiasm of a psychopathic monkey in their midst, anyway.
1. Busy day. I had a 3:50am wake up this morning. Took my brother to the airport. It was great having the whole family together this weekend. It was not great getting up that early.
1 core
By this point, some of you are probably checking to make sure you are actually on An Awfully Big Blog Adventure, and thinking, 'what's all this got to do with children's books?' Before I answer that question, let me put up another photo from my day at the Banksy exhibition:
His two daughters, aged 12 and 17, hid in the house, one calling their mother, Mr. Griessel's ex-wife, who hurried to the farm armed and together with her foreman and a retired police officer.
He'Brew Jewbelation 11
And my favorite rambling scribble from that night was
We watched each other fighting in separate wars
4. Just Go With It - Sucked
Including most of those "classical" CDs.
Looks like chocolate chip cookies, tastes like them too: but it’s way easier to get than you’re making it.
I love you more each time I talk to you. You totally rock, and i am so glad that i can count you as a friend now, and some one I can talk to as a person and as a woman. I know I wasn't an easy kid to raise (though compared to that brother of mine, I was a fair walk in the park, wasn't I?) and I sometimes wish I could go back and just kick my own ass for some of the stuff I did and said when I was younger. But I guess that's part of getting older, isn't it, wising up and realizing what an ABSOLUTE BONEHEAD you've been all your life. I am still a bonehead, but at least now I recognize it, and I just want to say thanks for dealing with me all these years. By rights, and you would have been forgiven, I am sure, you should have put me in the burlap sack and tossed my annoying ass in the pond, there to sink or swim, but you didn't and for that I say thank you.
That’s the claim now, anyway. I could get down to it and discover I loathe the process as much as the next guy. To give myself the best chance of getting the job done properly without ending up hating myself or (worse) the book, I’ve laid out a series of edits I’m going to do. In order, from macro to micro, major to minor.
in the bed of clouds.
one foot leads
Jane Rogers, the former Conservative councillor for Old St Mellons, said she was working with residents to hire a planning consultant to help their campaign.
Family values,
I use my iPad for most often for reading journal articles. Using the ATLA database through our library, I find an article of interest and send the PDF to my email. I can either copy it to my DropBox or send it to my Kindle as described above. Prior to buying an iPad, I either read the article online, or printed it for future reference. Anyone who has written a dissertation knows that you end up with a small forest of printed papers when researching, by reading on my iPad I save some time and money by not printing out articles. I sometimes send several articles on a topic to my Kindle app and head off to a coffee shop. Naturally this method will work with any online database that allows students to save files for offline reading.
"Let us purify ourselves from everything that contaminates body and spirit, perfecting holiness out of reverence for God."
“Unlike guilt, which is the feeling of doing something wrong,” she said, “shame is the feeling of being something wrong. When a person experiences shame, they feel ‘there is something basically wrong with me.’”
Personally, I wouldn't care what film I was seeing if I got to see it in large comfy seats with a glass of champagne in my hand...
As Huddersfield Town will visit the table topper Charlton Athletic on Monday night, Sheffield Wednesday can maintain the position in promotion equation.
Want extra entries? Do any or all of the following and receive an extra entry for each one. Be sure to leave additional separate comments for each additional entry. Thanks and good luck!
plummet plummet plummet
Malaysia has a population of 27,565,821 (according to Malaysia’s 2010 Census). How many Malaysians are online ? According the data found here , it is 64% of the population.
Michael Beekman, 39, New York, N.Y.
Participating Breweries:
I’m not worthy of them
There is another way up to Mount John however I find the lakeside view much more scenic.
This one is a Ludlow type letter box from the reign of King George V. It dates from 1910 -1920. There are only thirty two remaining in Britain. Apparently there are over 125,000 letter boxes (wall boxes, lamp boxes and pillar boxes) in total in the UK.
Will: just leave everything to the free market
Dio went on and joined Black Sabbath as their new vocalist, while Ozzy was away from the band for personal reasons. Black Sabbath was losing their ground in popularity, but after the two albums with Dio, it brought them back to the very best. Over time Dio started having problems with Black Sabbath the mixing of albums, then he left the band and started the band called Dio.
1/4 up champagne, 2 oz light orange juice, 2 oz fresh squeezed orange juice. About 120 calores.
I've raved about Ishii before on this blog, usually having unreasonable cinematic orgasms about his freak-oriented material such as Horrors of Malformed Men, Love and Crime, and Orgies of Edo. But Ishii also directed thrillers, outrageous erotic comedies, and torture-themed epics.
After school, I talked to Garret about the music for wind Symphony. Mr. Hilton finally told them what we’re playing. there are like six pieces! Luckily, two of them were written by students (Nick and Kyle) and when they gave me them Kyle even apologized for how simple it was and I told him that it was no problem because the simpler it was the easier it would be to use. So, I went into the music library to get the other four pieces and I got two of them and had to go ask Garret again because I couldn’t remember what the other two were. So I went back in (trying to rush because my dad was already outside waiting for me because it’s Wednesday and he doesn’t have a lot of time) and got the one piece, but the last piece was a mess. The folder it was in was totally unorganized. It wasn’t even organized by song (because it’s got more than one movement, and sometimes when pieces have a lot of movements the copies of music are organized that way. I don’t think it’s supposed to be, but we have done it in the past.) So I was trying to find the oboe part, of which there’s always only one or two, and I had to go through the whole stack twice.
Dawn’s British biological mother, Linda, gave her up for adoption when she was born in June 1973, after Linda’s Jamaican immigrant husband, Owen, walked out on her. Dawn’s foster parents Pete — now 70 and a retired civil servant — and Gina, 69, had two daughters and a son of their own but were overjoyed that they were able to look after Dawn, too. She says: ‘They were generous people who wanted to help others less fortunate.
Beadboard paneling with a 7" base and a 5" cap
On the the 17th Lucy and Markas have thier vision test and on the 26th Josh sees the audiologist.
for the life we are seeking,LOL. We've found the state we want, without a doubt....but still seeking our little bit remote, homesteaded, built with our own hands, mom at home place in the world. It's funny how you have things pictured in your head as to how you expect them to be, and most of the time they never are. We can see alot of exactly what we are looking for, we just can't figure out how to get across that "barrier" to land where we wish too, if that makes any sense. There are folks all around this area that are living exactly the type of life we are looking for, we just have to figure out and plan how to take the step "backwards" out of what feels like surburban living back into our more normal country type life...only with the extra we felt like we were missing that we feel abundantly here in Alaska. I'm probably rambling and scattering strange thoughts, but I'm (secretly) hopeful that writing it down will settle all the ideas, thoughts, and extra baggage whirling around in my head so I can figure out how to focus on achieving our goals. Ok, feel better getting some of that outta my head, maybe now I can sleep so I can go to work tomorrow and not feel completely stressed because me working is the opposite of what we want, but is necessary for the time being since we are starting our whole world over from scratch. Gosh, now it sounds like I am whining, and I promise I'm not (!!!!), guess I'm just tired, a bit frustrated, and just totally lacking on ideas at the moment on how to achieve our dream short of winning a lottery so we can afford to buy a place. On the bright side, I really really love Alaska ;-)
so curious...
It feel warm when I witness subtle delicacy of Japanese people who take care of smaller things even though some people might think ” it is just cigarettes or recycle.”
And that was it. Quick, efficient, even enjoyable. Kerri picked me up and I was back home for a late morning tea in the sun.
Rob Riggs is a journalist, cryptozoologist, paranormal investigator, and author of In The Big Thicket On the Trail of the Wild Man: Exploring Nature’s Mysterious Dimension (New York, Paraview Press, 2001, 185 pp. $13.95. ISBN #-1-931044-26-0). A child of the Big Thicket and an avid outdoorsman, Riggs came to the field of paranormal investigation quite naturally—there were strange occurrences in the area where he had grown up that he just could not explain. The closer he looked into these happenings, the more questions he had.
As is always the case definitions vary and I’d say it is the use area that is the contentious one here. Some people view open access as being purely about access, while others see there as being more to it (open licences etc.) The OA introductory article written by Peter Suber focuses on open access to peer-reviewed research articles and their preprints.
The officer - identified in the piece only as 'Officer A' but subsequently named as Peter Black - does not specify which campaigns he infiltrated and undermined. The use of the plural is interesting and, given that the Lawrence campaign was by far the most prominent, it would be surprising if he had not targetted them.
7. Ballad of a Has Been Beauty Queen
Are you kidding me ?
Mashable partnered with Venture Studio to interview John Walker. Watch the video above to learn more about Echoing Green.
On the president’s reading vacation reading list: “President Reagan: The Role of a Lifetime,” Lou Cannon’s biography of the Republican president.
Would he have faced the same threats or would there have been a carpet of red roses waiting for him?
So what is Tidal Current Power?
The 2nd night we had a huge choucroute garnie dinner complete with Lauren's awesome sauerkraut, pork belly, sausages, hot dogs and pretzel rolls.
Getting enough vitamin B12 may be an issue for some vegetarians, although this vitamin is present in both eggs and dairy products. Vitamin supplements that contain vitamin B12 are recommended, as are fortified soy products and nutritional yeast.
As I lean in to pick a particularly ripe blueberry, I suddenly find myself
So what is it that's so great about control?
Back in 2006, I had the great fortune of winning a contest through the magazine, Gourmet. The competition, called “Cook the Cover”, consisted of taking Gourmet’s cover recipe and putting one’s own spin on it. The recipe was for Chocolate Mink pudding cakes. Since I had moved to San Diego around that time, Mexican influences were on my mind. I decided to add ground cinnamon to the batter, make a cajeta (a caramel sauce made with goat’s milk) as a topping, and finally topped with toasted pecans. I named it “Mexican Turtle Chocolate Mink”. A few recipes battled for votes, and my recipe won! (Thank you, again, to so many family and friends who voted!)
"It's a full moon," said a mustached officer. I asked if the shooting victim was alive. The clean-shaven of the two said, "hang on," and walked over to an idling black van, the type usually transporting Night Watch detectives. He came back and said, "I can't say."
“Chocolate Mama” is about a woman whom held a dark secret from her past that could destroy her family as a whole, or her soul. Her boyfriend, who later becomes her husband, held a darker secret that would rip his family and the entire world apart.
In early 1991 my brother and I decided on our first trip to Amsterdam. This was before the advent of cheap flights, and involved a National Express coach from Glasgow to Hull, an overnight ferry to Rotterdam, a bus trip from the ferry terminal to Rotterdam station, then finally a train up to Amsterdam. All in all it took about a day to get there!
Tomorrow: For Fiction Friday, I'll share a little of what I learned from Mary Buckham, who is the best teacher of the craft of plotting that I've ever met.
Oh boy... On Time. Ha! There wasn't "On Time" there was "Rose Time". She'd always show up, just when you thought you'd misunderstood where you were supposed to meet for an event she was leading. She'd show up with everything ready to go, both her girls, and move the group out in a flash. I got to where I would just tell my Mom not to worry, we were on Rose time. Come to think of it, I think I might have adopted Rose Time as my own time zone. I'm always about 5 mins late, but I'm always manage to arrive just before the fun starts. :)
When my jam happened yesterday, my very first reaction was to get angry.
Saturday we met friends to go to the RV Show. They’re shopping, and it’s so much fun to go along and look at all the goodies out there! They came home for dinner, and another couple joined us, and we ate and laughed and played cards until bed time.
So let’s take a moment to ask Jaci our author questions before moving on to Jaci’s Play By Play series.
–SW
front of card - lying flat
Rise, phoenix.
That's FXXXin' pathetic.
Dannie Richmond (drums), Don Pullen (piano),
My other reason for starting this little baby, is because we've got some big changes coming up, and I wanted to be able to share them with our family and friends. It shames me to admit this, but I am horrible at sending pictures, and regular email updates (Sorry Mom, I know I always say I'll email pictures and never do) so I thought here would be a good place to share the little things, the things I don't always remember to tell everyone about. With living so far away from our family and friends, this is my way of opening our doors and welcoming unexpected visitors to our home.
UPDATE II: A perusal of the Facebook group in questions reveals that 1) the group allows the addition of registered Facebook users to the group by other members with or without their explicit consent, 2) members have stated that they have done so, and 3) I just added someone else to the group without his or her consent as a test. So take any membership numbers touted by the group with extreme suspicion and skepticism.
Article 29 Working Party adopted on 23 March its Opinion on the proposed EU data protection reform package, criticizing the lack of ambition of the Directive regarding data protection in police and criminal justice matters and also finding some flaws in the proposed Regulation.
His actions were taken unjust
05) Freebird (Lynyrd Skynyrd)
There are a few out there that not only offer far better services but you will also pay less in your subs and I can assure you that every bit will count, very soon.
1 ½ cups fresh strawberries (or enough strawberries to fill the bottom of your tart crust)
Although I've not done this myself why not? A fashion blog is a creative outlet which should be fun and a source of inspiration. I see a blog as a personal mood board and doing this type of post would be an excellent way to archive your inspired wardrobe combinations to refer to when you actually want to wear them out. I sometimes see bloggers asking readers for feedback on a look they post to decide whether they will wear it out.
In the same sort of way, I don’t believe in writer’s block, just like I don’t believe in a whole lot of other man-made concepts. Man-made concepts are seldom about the truth. I do, however, believe writing has a rhythm, just like the seasons do. If the words aren’t there today, or I don’t feel like writing, I honour and respect that – and do something else. If, however, I have a deadline to meet, I meet it – that’s about discipline, that’s something I can control because it’s about me and not some funky concept with which too many people to beat themselves up.
school & I felt myself seeking comfort in food. I am seriously asking for you to pray
He wrote: “To dispel the rumor that the fire was started by Nero, Nero substituted as culprits, and treated with the most extreme punishments, some people, popularly known as Christians, whose disgraceful activities were notorious. The originator of that name, Christus, had been executed when Tiberius was Emperor, by order of the procurator Pontius Pilatus. But the deadly cult, though checked for a time, was now breaking out again not only in Judea, the birthplace of this evil, but even throughout Rome, where all the nasty and disgusting ideas from all over the world pour in and find a ready following.” (Annals 15:44). This means there were a significant number of Christians in Rome in 64AD, only 30 years after the Crucifixion of Christ.
A while back (In the Middle of May) C took J boy to the Father/Son Camp out for our Ward(Church). It was just an over nighter. This was his second year taking his only son to the camp out and as far as I know they had a blast, especially J boy, what boy doesn't love to get dirty and sleep on the hard ground in a tent?
Well, apparently you don’t want to mess with this dad. After his 15 year old daughter wrote a Facebook post completely and totally shitting on him and her mother, he absolutely had enough and really called her to the carpet.
Cenarion War Hippogryph – 2000 gold + Exalted with Cenarion Expedition
I am grateful to be sober. I am grateful for a loving God who always has my back. I am grateful to be listening to birds singing this morning. I am grateful that in a few minutes I will be walking the downtown streets that I love so. This is my city. The city where I got sober, and that will always make it HOME in my heart.
Half Romany himself, Ray is well aware that he's been chosen more for his blood than his investigative skills. Still, he's surprised by the intense hostility he encounters from the Jankos, who haven't had an easy past. Touched by tragedy, they're either cursed or hiding a terrible secret-whose discovery Ray can't help suspecting is connected to Rose's disappearance. . . .
For now printing out my blog is just a fantastic family journal and I love it!
markers
But more importantly, I think, he simplified the character. He wiped away all those clumsy contradictions, internet false memes of violent pig-headedness, only having powers in England and of his alleged alcoholism, having Brian reborn (literally) with a simple, clear powerset which both respected the characters past but also made it easily accessible to new readers.
As I parked my car, I can only spot Chunnie’s car in one of the parking spaces. I frowned, but went on anyway to the 25th floor. As I walked into the office, I saw Jaejoong hyung and Chunnie talking happily amongst themselves.
This was such an amazing book! And in so many more ways than you would think from the blurb! I just loved it!
Can you see wabi sabi in you? Your perfect imperfection? Can you see how it makes you unique? How your flaws make you beautiful?
- My wife says: I do want team cruz to win.
There is also a supportive nutrition plan which is very useful. This covers all your nutritional needs, what you need to have in your kitchen cupboards and how often you should really eat. There is a create a menu planner which will help you plan your own menus for weight loss success.
THE RABIES (Larchmont, NY)
A young soldier fell down and died at the end of a four-day drill for an elite army unit, either because he was medically unfit, or because he was dehydrated, or because of a combination of the two – either way, a young, brave life apparently lost because of inadequate oversight. A woman was critically injured as she stood solemnly by her car at the side of the road to honor the memory of the victims of the Holocaust, crushed by another driver who careened blindly round the corner. And another soldier, a young female officer, was killed when the lighting rig above the stage where she was rehearsing for Independence Day smashed down upon her. You simply could not conjure up a starker metaphorical warning – the youth, vigor and optimism of Independence, decades of potential, broken in an instant, snuffed out, by a callous indifference to safeguarding the future.
*OK, so I know that other parents have this same issue, and it’s to be expected when you work from home with small kids at home. There’s just something about that phone that makes the world turn upside down. Am I right?
"The Red Shoes" also sees Bush resume her periodic delvings into
Research released last week found that 526 000 people die a violent death every year, but only 55 000 lose their lives in a conflict or terrorism.
Bella
Rain upon my window go away,
"Stephanie" 12x6 inches, oil on canvas by Ruth Andre
We went on a playdate the other day, at the Westroads play area, and every time we meet up with other kids you just blow my mind. After an initial shy period where you adorably bury your head in my shoulder, you are so outgoing and friendly. Other kids flock to you, and you to them. I watched you crawl off to a group of slightly older kids and play with them in the tunnel. At one point you were in the tunnel, back against one side and feet up on the other, with two kids on either side of you. Another time we went to the Aksarben Park with Sunny and you took off across the park, not caring whether I was behind you. You then found a group of slightly older kids and worked yourself into their activities.
I hope you all have a lovely day too. Don't forget to alter your clocks ... spring forward :)
Times like this makes me realize that some of the things that I make a big deal of are not really all that important. I try very hard to let things go and be as they are, but as we all know, that is very difficult in this day and age. But losing someone we care about does bring it all home on how short our time here really is. For instance, everyone's been blogging about how awful winter has been, the huge amounts of snow and the long depressing months of winter. But yet, here it is already March - how that happened I have no idea - and spring is just around the corner. Before you know it, summer will be here and we'll be rushing through another year.
The Old Fitz is fine and the Weller is good but neither of these match up to the better Stitzel-Wellers I've had. They both had a certain flatness to them.
D
In 1957, when his friend Norman Williams died, Robert took the news hard but, called on the draw the final episode of ‘The Great Sailor’ (the story of Nelson), he did so, although his artwork was not credited. After he left in 1959 to take a break from weekly deadlines, ‘Jack o’Lantern’ continued, drawn by another artist (C. L. Doughty), but only for another 31 episodes.
“One pitcher, sit in the back and leave when you’re done.”
I shan’t elaborate too much about my folks, but I admittedly do get burnt out being around with them due to the lack of positivity like support, encouragements and jokes (some insights from this entry I wrote).
By the next day, I had eaten the rest of the fruit, and it was deeeeelicious (the orange bowl, by the way, found a new home on my end table). And my tweets caught the attention of the folks at Edible Arrangements, who tweeted back, saying they enjoyed the pictures I shared, and that they had checked out my blog. Awesome! Next thing I know, an email from them arrived with an offer to sponsor a giveaway on my site! How cool is that?!?
modgepodged itself
The no name brand cheap mp3 players come in so many styles and varieties now that for buyers it can be a difficult decision on picking the right one. After your initial decision is made and you are happy with your…
Cassandra Caravello is one of Renaissance Venice’s lucky elite: with elegant gowns, sparkling jewels, her own lady’s maid, and a wealthy fiancé, she has everything a girl could desire. Yet ever since her parents’ death, Cassandra has felt trapped, alone in a city of water, where the dark and labyrinthine canals whisper of escape.
He was my strength.
1: Gun control
Each of us has our own unique flaw. But it's the cracks and flaws we each have that make our lives together so very interesting and rewarding.
And the Bible is a closed book. It not open to debate or negotiation.
Iceland wins another survey, then gets pissed at the happy results
Recently, I was strongly urged to upgrade the lunch bag I had used for years to a newer model. I’ve packed and brought my own lunch to work for decades, beginning long before the recessionista fashionistas made it trendy. Somewhere during that time, I acquired a simple yellow cloth sack with the then-innovative feature of a Velcro strip. The shapeless design allowed me to cram it full of sandwiches, cookies, fruit and cereal bars, then stuff that into my equally decrepit “briefcase”.
I'm spending too much time with my head stuck in the internet, trawling for things to inspire my new work, which I hope to begin construction on next weekend after the last days of cleaning and packing are behind me and the joy on unpacking- and decorating- lays ahead.
Ronaldo was left unattended outside the penalty area and fired a low shot past the goalkeeper in the 14th minute to take control of the matters over the visitors who came in with a 2-1 lead from Germany last week.
It is a gorgeous day out today around 70* or so and sunny skies and we're to have another wk. of Indian Summer~YAY! I don't want it to turn cold out yet for awhile, I'm just not ready. Can't believe the holidays are upon us already! Does everyone have their Christmas shopping done yet?? LOL
There. Not that people LISTEN to that. My oldest son read yesterday’s post, as did at least two of my former students who posted to my Facebook wall. And to clear up any misconceptions about the role of the poll, I am not going to DO what you TELL me to do. Since when has that ever been a real concern?
Men should lower their eyelids
I hope this, if nothing else, helps those who are sick of us talking about it to understand why we talk about it so much. GSW is, to this day, one of the most significant experiences of my short life. I owe it so much, I can’t even explain it articulately. A blog post might be a pretty small thing to offer, but it could be a step in the right direction.
But today especially is awesome, because my future mother in law and I had lunch today. Our first lunch alone! And to be honest, I thought it would be weird, and maybe awkward, with us having nothing to say to each other. But I had fun. We bonded. And laughed. And chatted. And it was really nice.
If we learn to accept the will of God, the situation we find ourselves in, the church we are called to and the marriage that we are bound to, and we not only accept it but embrace His will, we will find that the mundane becomes something far greater. Eating the same old thing becomes an opportunity to give thanks to our Lord for His continual provision. That job now is a blessing undeserved through which God provides not only what we need but what we enjoy too. Our churches become venues to minister to others rather than just taking from others. Marriage and family become the practice field for learning God’s character, love and your need for His grace. All the things that are so mundane become glorious when we embrace the Lord and see things His way rather than our way. Instead of lusting for things to change we should desire and pursue the transformation of our own character, desires and ambitions. We need to go from a selfish outlook to one of a servant saved by grace. When we realize how great our God is and how deep and wide His love for us is we can’t help but be content. And when we learn contentment from being more like Christ all of that adds up to a gloriously profound life, no matter how dreary the circumstance. Contentment with godliness IS the recipe for a fulfilling and satisfying life (I Timothy 6:6, Philippians 4:11-13). Variety may be a spice in life, but joy comes from a changed heart rather than changed circumstances.
And we’ve — we’ve had eight children. We are blessed to be raising seven. We’ve been through a lot together, losing a child, having a child with a disability that we have now, our little Bella.
Announced a day before the Mardi Gras weekend celebrations, the breakfast tacos were as much a product of my incessant fiddling with Lockhart leftovers and the posting of the resultant photos, my tweets encouraging the introduction of other tacos at the Bishop Arts District barbecue joint and the tinkering of the pitmasters and co-owners Jeff and Jill Bergus and Tim McLaughlin. The breakfast taco I was praying for and teased with the day before—one with Kreuz sausage—didn’t make it onto the menu that day. (“One day. We want to do it right, though.” Jeff Bergus teased again!) What did make it to the tables was an excellent example of the greatest thing
- Import images
Committee Members and Consultants
I have errands to run today, but maybe I will at least get started on my project.
Alright, just returned from the ECCC. For those who don’t know and aren’t familiar, in addition to boat shows, car shows and even lawn shows, there are conventions for geeks and nerds. This weekend was the Comic Convention. Nominally, this invokes images of geeks gathered together to pore over their sheets of paper covered in protective plastic sleeves. … This is still mostly true.
Maybe I will be able to get a picture of it. But every time I try to look in there he sticks his tongue out, so I can't figure out how to get a picture. Oh well. It is there!
We decided to eat at Olive Garden. When we reached the hostess stand, I asked for a gluten-free menu. Unknown to me a few months ago about these menus, I realize now that most restaurants are carrying them, typically included in their allergy info. Olive Garden's is in their allergen info brochure, but they actually do have a section that is their gluten-free menu. They had several dishes and a couple of kids dishes that were all able to be adjusted to be gluten-free. I decided to order Sophie some pasta with chicken and marinara sauce, making sure to keep any cheese off of it. When ordering, I tried to make sure that the waitress we had realized the importance of preparing Sophie's food. She assured me the kitchen would do their best. Despite everything I could do and say, I still was very nervous. I couldn't stop wondering if 2 hours later we would have a sick girl who would just cry and need to be changed a few times every hour.
There was plenty of scope to experiment as Horslips were always more than a three-chord band, combining Irish trad with psychedelic rock and mixing electric guitars with fiddles, mandolins and electric organs.
Working on my cadence has nearly cured my plantar fascitis – and (God forbid) you ever develop it I can pass on some other “nuggets” I’ve found too!
I think so many adults want kids to trust them SO BADLY that they’ve forgotten how few adults kids can really count on. We’re not supposed to tell kids, “We can’t protect you so you’ll have to learn to protect yourself.” But um. For a lot of kids it’s true, and I think a lot of people reading probably learned that firsthand.
And, wouldn't you know, the first stop was . . . . . . EUROPE!
Seeing is a big deal: hasn’t that been the thread through what I’m saying here!?
Yesterday and today, it was a little better, but I still spent most of both days with it propped up with a heating pad. I did nothing but watch tv and movies. Hubby went camping, so I had to wait on myself, but it was okay as I was not in screaming agony when I had to refill my own drinks and get my own food.
FA: It is a very special win. I think Silverstone is a special event for every driver competing in Formula One. We know the history of motorsport here in the UK so it is special grand prix. Also today I had the privilege to drive the Jose (Froilan Gonzalez’s) car. It was the first Ferrari win in Formula One and this year it is 60 years ago that one Ferrari car won the first grand prix in Formula One. Today we won on the same circuit with the same passion, with the same group of people, working for this fantastic team. Every year competing in Formula One right from the beginning so this is the big thing about Ferrari. The passion, the victory and the love for competition so very happy to drive this car and achieve this success again.
So how are we justified or declared righteous? The answer follows in verse 24.
After some actual detective work, Nick and Hank realize Fred is using old train tracks to travel and probably hiding in the hills. Ariel calls Nick and says she’s willing to help him find her father but she wants him at her house tonight. Nick agrees and immediately calls Juliette to let her know Hank will be by his side this time. I thought that scene was adorable and it made my jaded heart smile. That was the first time I actually liked Nick – sad it was a moment that showed he’s whipped (wha-psh!).
My boys, my young men who were as close as brothers, all around me. We whispered as we passed each other.
I'll be covering the conference on behalf of the Japan Beer times.
PS: The mental health presentation included reference to community recovery in a place called Gheel, Belgium. Very interesting stuff … you should look it up!
I've always wanted to go to DC for the 4th just to experience the fireworks on The Mall. I can now check that off of my list of things to do during my lifetime.
Paul Nguyen: “The foremost appeal was the action and hilarity, but besides that, there was an intriguing use of superheroes of many types. None fell into the shadow of another. Captain America’s patriotism was well emphasized as well as his physical prowess. Thor’s god-like presence was well felt, but his obvious superiority to the others did not overshadow the overall awesomeness of the Avengers. Iron Man’s wittiness came through well. Hulk’s violent hilarity was strong, especially in his thrashing of Loki. It was about the superheroes as a whole rather than a single superior superhero.”
This is not to negate the legal aspect of the Torah, however, because the laws governing various aspects of Hebrew life were numerous and detailed, as can be seen by simply glancing through either the books of Exodus, Leviticus or Deuteronomy, where over 600 laws are set down for everything from dietary habits, war, criminal prosecution, land disputes and monetary issues. These of course would later be used by the Pharisees and Sadducees to gain greater political clout inJerusalem; thousands of extra laws dictating every possible action would be set down by these two groups and would be one of the main contention points for Jesus Christ and the Apostle Paul after the birth of Christianity.
And all sounded eerily like…well, something Marilyn might say. (For those of you new to the blog, Marilyn is the silly little pseudonym a friend of mine created for my ex’s once-high-school-girlfriend, now new wife. More context can be found here.)
Three year olds are delicious, don't you think? Smack in between the terrible twos and the oh-so-grown-up fours, three year old children are just gorgeous. There's usually still rounded chubby cheeks, or a baby lisp, or the desire to snuggle right into Mummy's lap. Combined with growing independence, pride in their own new skills and a developing sense of humour, it's a heady mix.
You want to know one of the coolest gifts I’ve ever received? If you’re into diamonds and big electronics, you’re going to think this gift sucked. Just skip this part and meet me at the next paragraph. For those of you who stuck around, here it is: I met a guy I’ll call Maynard. Alas! we weren’t meant to be. However, I still carry a gift from Maynard—his words. One fine night, we were talking about I-don’t-even-remember-what. But it involved my other-ness, and all the various and sundry ways my other-ness was messing with the perfect life I had laid out for myself in my noggin. Maynard listened quietly, kindly, and patiently, and then he rocked my world by saying, “I think you’ve spent your whole life asking, “what’s wrong with me?” when the better question is really, “what’s wrong with them?”” HOLD THE PHONE! You mean there’s a possibility that I’m operating on a better plane than the rest of the world, and that someone else sees that? That “other” could be a sign of something so much, well, other than what I thought?
The ECS does have nice deep jimping on both the spine and the unlocking bar, but the rearward ones were pretty useless, it is too short for a reverse grip. The holes in the grip did help a bit with providing more friction, but I think G10 would have been a better choice than the slicker stock polymer. The cross style guard for this seemed a poor choice for this smaller version due to the style in which the blade must be drawn. To be more in line with that, perhaps a thumb ramp instead of the top guard and then extending the bottom guard would fare better. I found that the grip was simply too short for me. I wish I could handle the larger versions to see if the grip design is only problematic in this shorter neck knife version.
Preachers will never be a Moses, but they will surely feel the wrath and complaining that Moses experienced – to a much lesser degree, of course. A preacher almost has to be a mother in order to heal wounded egos of a brother or sister who feels he (she) has been slighted. A preacher needs to be a parent to make right when two brothers or two sisters (in the Lord) are fussing at one another. A preacher needs to be a grandparent with many years of wisdom to help troubled souls know what course of action to travel. A preacher needs to be a father who is plain spoken to administer discipline in the form of a stern talking to. Do you think Moses had to go through all this? I suspect he did.
Kraft Macaroni and Cheese. Come on, name someone who doesn't enjoy this food? It's a childhood staple and still beloved by many adults. However, the generic brands aren't the same- you need to have the name brand stuff.
The story begins as Jeremy Papier, a gently, charmingly goofy young man, fresh from a chef’s apprenticeship in France, is meeting his quasi-estranged father with whom he has had little contact over the last ten years, in Vancouver’s Stanley Park. The premature death of Jeremy’s mother, Helene, who had been, clearly, the family’s gravitational centre, had sent the two men spinning off into very separate orbits – Jeremy to France, where he came to embrace the idea of culinary tradition and the importance of regional ingredients, and his father “the professor,” who escaped deeper into obsessive academic theories and his studies of the homeless.
Me: Like what?
Wife:
ANOTHER celebrity book? Are you kidding me? *looks at the back cover* Hm... It seems interesting enough but I wouldn't...I couldn't...Maybe...
It is now coming to an end with a most beautiful sunset, I cannot remember when we last had one this year. I do hope this warmer weather we have had for the last two days lasts a bit longer.
They mustn't be that good if they are worth so little.Not having the death penalty, yeah, is like selling surprisingly cheap bananas. Right? Why would anyone eat cheap bananas? It seems obvious now he's said it. But you would never have thought of this analogy, would you? That's the difference between normal, human folk like you, and The Professional Writer. They're missing a trick not paywalling this stuff.
There is a political contingent on the right and a political contingent on the left who want very much, for separate reasons, to pigeon-hole the “black church” as angry black-Jesus-warriors against “oppression” and “rich people.” And that’s simply not the reality of the range of black churches in America.
Bulb of garlic chopped in half horizontally
So far today I have eaten:
President Obama has now signed the America Invents Act (AIA) into law, following a process which began when Congress and US industry first sought to overhaul the US patent system in 2004 and which draws US practice closer to the patent laws of the rest of the world than has previously been the case.
Lemon Chalet Cremes: Featuring a design of Our Chalet in Switzerland, a beloved Girl Scout World Center, this sandwich cookie has a touch of cinnamon-ginger spice that evokes the warmth of a fireside chat on a snowy evening.
Eliza is a wonderful character, flawed, beautiful, intelligent, prejudiced, wonderful and just amazing.
The Swedish supergroup was first formed in Stockholm in 1970.
It was definitely as day of two halves, IT wise, although both were enjoyable. My first session about MOUSE wasn't in the Library which is being renovated but in STOCKTON LIBRARY LECTURE HALL. A bright new room it was, with two screens to show my powerpoint presentation either side of the room, and a tiny pen thingy I could click for the next slide. Even the chairs impressed the children, with the mix of toning purple and deep purple upholstery. The Year 6’s of ST BEDE’S RC PRIMARY and OXBRIDGE PRIMARY made such a great audience!
Speech and Debate season is in FULL swing, and L, the head coach, gave me today off. It's so nice, as the next three tournaments are the big ones..."Little" which qualifies students to the state tournament, "Bigs" which qualifies students to the national tournament, and the State tournament. Thankfully in February our tournaments go every other weekend, so in two weekends I'll be off again. Our national tournament is in Dallas, TX this June. I'm hoping I'll be attending that as well! ;)
(12.5 / 3 = 4.16) x 4 = 16.6 mph.
oriented dwellings), fire prevention, and insulation for energy efficiency.
In Cleveland, everyone was born here. No one moves here and no one moves away. It’s a life sentence to be a Clevelander. Clevelanders do not see themselves as others see them. They vehemently and with much hostility, declare what a great place this is to live and anyone who doesn’t like it can go take a hike. With every Top 10 Worst Cities rating that comes out, you can just bet that Cleveland is on there somewhere. We will have the worst rating for the rudest city, and the response from locals will be to call in to the local radio show and rail for 10 minutes about the @**&% idiot who did the @#*$*@ survey without anyone even stopping to think for a minute that the conversation just proved the point of the survey. Hmmmmmmmmmmmmm.
09 State Enemy
tathā śarīrāṇi vihāya jīrṇāny
Draw a line right in the middle of the longest side of the triangle. And that’s where your point is going to form. To do this, take one corner, and roll it in on itself, so that the corner lines up at the point of the triangle. Wrap the other side around to the back, and you’ll see that the two sides will line up right down the middle.
Catalog#: AMBT 7
Me: Before or after they were done?
I am not sure how long I will be icing his hinny, but I do know not near as long as I expected to be doing wound care and oh so much simpler! It truly was an answer to prayer!
counting provided relief in the middle of the dark and tremulous night but not of the ordinary kind no no not that in fact the fibonacci sequence was used to great effect although it became difficult to keep track once past the first few handfuls of steps one one two three five eight is all easy enough but god knows the trouble i had with getting as far as two thousand five hundred and eighty four in fact i venture to suggest that i may never have got there although i would like to think
In the obnoxious way they carry themselves—the testosterone-rich swagger, the arrogant chewing of gum—you would think that by some divine right, India is destined to win always, no matter what, and the other team is only there to help them do that.
Her husband may have tried a weak protest but was soon won over by this lovable little cat.
When I approached my friend about putting together more "authentic costumes," she responded that there were "no authentic costumes."
So the clocks went forward and all I have to say about that is... SUCK IT DAYLIGHT SAVINGS! (Note: I'll enjoy the new time after work if the sun is shining this afternoon, but for now I'm moody, tired and this coffee isn't doing jack for me!).
But today is a new day and so far so good. I have just made up some pancake batter and I am just about to cook some up. Now I know what you are thinking, pancakes are not healthy! But I added up the calories and they are about 138 each, so if I have two and top with strawberries and small amount of maple syrup, I should be fine!
"Don't be rude," Cassandra said.
Using a serrated knife, cut the log into 8 to 10 slices.
Another thing I picked up at the Dallas farmer's market was a pound of Kirby cucumbers. I fully intended to pickle them using a boiling water method so that they'd keep for months, but life happened as it sometimes does, and I never had the free afternoon to do so. All the while, they were getting older by the day and my crisper couldn't work miracles much longer. It was either do something with them - quick - on they'd quickly become scraps for the chickens. Every time I thought of them becoming food for chickens, I remembered the excitement I felt when I bought them thinking, "I'm going to make pickles!" and I imagined how I'd feel cutting them up and tossing them out.
Round 8: Ch 3. Dc in first 8 dc. Ch 4. Sc around all chs into 5th skipped dc on Round 5 (see photos below).
Every fifteen minutes or so we kept rechecking her temperature, she was trending down which we took as a sign to bring her in in the morning. After struggling to find sleep she finally did at around 12:45 pm.
- Posted using BlogPress from my iPod
Getting ready for these collages was an opportunity to look through some of the papers I've been collecting, hording, squirrelling away for years. These gorgeous marbled papers are from Florence (the photo doesn't do justice to their rich colours and fabulous patterns).
With the reality of tragedies like Trayvon Martin becoming more visible, there has been a lot of conversation about who Emmett Till is. The goal of this film, is to educate the viewing public on this very important story in American history. The conversation will start, right here on Life Full Circle Radio.
effect. You can take My so-called drivers license and shove it! You
But then the weather starts acting up--strange twists of wind, leading to a massive storm that seems linked to Simon's sudden fever. And a stranger, a tall lanky man named Otis, appears in the barn...bringing the news that Simon is a Storm Maker, one of an elite cabral that can actually control the weather.
Oh man, I just got back from New Orleans and my feet are trashed...I am a fairly smart cookie, but I learned never to ever ever ever again travel without bringing tennis shoes again. My feet are covered in blisters and spots rubbed raw by 3, yes 3, different pairs of sandals. Two of which admittedly I bought to try to improve the condition of my feet but yeah....I've learned...
We are finally getting settled in. The kids have been enjoying their weekly Classical Conversations, we've found a few homeschool groups to plug into and we've made some real connections and friendships. We found out that one of our homeschool family buddies lives only a block away from us, so we've been able to visit with them quite often!
After the roaring success of similar campaigns for both Tibet and Willy, it’s now time to discuss Free Energy. (Ha.)
Key Players: Jeremy Lamb (17.9 ppg), Shabazz Napier (12.6 ppg, 5.9 apg), Ryan Boatright (10.7 ppg, 4.2 apg), Andre Drummond (10.1 ppg, 7.6 rpg)
I’ve long known that I’m good at my job. I now know that I rock at it. How do I know this? A manager from a rival fast food restaurant tried to poach me.
people who can enrich their lives. the series will include famous artists, explorers, political leaders,
Have a lovely Monday, friends :)
A few months back everyone was playing words with friends who still plays that or was that a game a bit like draw something? Do we get bored fast and wait for the next ‘fun, interactive, bringing friends together, game app’?
12. Silent Homecoming
Deanna Sellyeh - I always had design related interests but I didn't know that interior design was a career until relatively late in the game. If you'd asked me at age ten, I probably would have said I wanted to design cars or be a carpenter.
“Early in life, individuals develop an internalized view of themselves as adequate or inadequate within the world,” she said. “Children who are continually criticized, severely punished, neglected, abandoned, or in other ways abused or mistreated get the message that they do not ‘fit’ in the world — that they are inadequate, inferior or unworthy.”
In a small scene there are several possible explanations for this, since causation could go either way. By this I mean that it's possible Alan Bearman is such an amazing and powerful agent that he is most folk musicians' first choice. Or that it's such a small scene that he's the only agent some folkies have heard of when they're looking around for representation. Weirdly, though, in the three or four years since I've been writing about folk I don't think I've ever met or heard from him.
¾ cup of jaggery.
Guitarist/vocalist Joao Gilberto is credited with being the originator of the bossa nova, due to his 1950s affiliation with songwriter Antonio Carlos Jobim. Hence, the rest is history. While this recording captures his genius via a solo perfomance at Italy's "Umbria Jazz" festival in 1996. His easily identifiable sound is intact here, as Gilberto delves into fourteen pieces, composed by Jobim and others. The artist's wistful, hush-toned vocals and rhythmically charged acoustic guitar work just reaffirms his significance in modern music. He typifies the coolness of Brazil amid his relatively toe-tapping pulses and contrasting melodic interludes. Part of the beauty, resides within his often-lilting harmonic structures, deterministic sense of purpose and understated themes. Gilberto's sensual demeanor and calming celebration of life hits the mark in a huge way, largely due to his effortless mode of execution and inspiring musical persona. ~ AllMusic
I got distracted by other projects in the meantime, and worked on it now and then, but really started knuckling down in October, and was working on it exclusively, full-time. A couple more drafts, and one more edit later, and now I am finally done.
1 Add or initialize one or more disks
...is one strategy...but a poor, desperate and very sad one, in my view. To me, this is like sitting back, drinking a coke and watching a group of psychopaths gangraping my loved ones, my Family. That's how I feel; and that's because that's exactly what's happening. My Family 'is' being gangraped and massacred...I don't care how many toys and pacifiers or "bread and games" (i.e. better jobs, internet, credit, vacations in the south, planes, cars, shops, refrigerators full of crappy foods, etc.) the gangrapists offer me or force on me, this is still a gangrape. It's infuckinsane!
Earth’s spin axis, in addition to being tilted twenty-three and a half degrees, wobbles. This change in position causes the equinoctial points to regress by one degree every seventy-two years; it changes the viewpoint of one zodiacal constellation every two-thousand-one-hundred-sixty years, making one complete revolution every twenty-five-thousand-nine-hundred-twenty years.
Liu has been a Rhodes scholar and Supreme Court clerk; the American Bar Association gave him its highest ranking; he is known to be an authority on law and the Constitution. He has also gained bipartisan support. Richard Painter, Bush’s chief ethics counsel who worked on the confirmations of Chief Justice John Roberts and Justice Samuel Alito, wrote that Liu is an “exceptionally qualified, measured, and mainstream nominee” that the Senate should “vote to confirm.” Kenneth Starr, known for his incessant prosecution of former President Bill Clinton, called Liu “a person of great intellect, accomplishment, and integrity” and “an extraordinarily qualified nominee.” Fox News anchor and legal analyst Megyn Kelly said, “His qualifications are unassailable.” Norman Mineta, who served as secretary of Transportation for former President George W. Bush, wrote a passionate defense of him in The Hill.
Sassy Studios has donated your choice of 4 digi images!!!
Judiciary ranking member Jeff Sessions requested that Shane examine the issue earlier this month as staffers for Leahy and Sessions continue meeting with stakeholders about the topic.
Then on my favourite armchair
Level 5: MP Cost: 24, Duration: 90 seconds, Defense: +25%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +15%, Elemental Resistance: +15%.
According to the city kansas missouri news televison and broke the city kansas missouri news televison of Harvard, was adopted as an athletic color to honor Col John J Cook, who graduated from Harvard, because of Kansas, which became the city kansas missouri news televison to the city kansas missouri news televison and football championship games. Most recently racing has come to KC in the city kansas missouri news televison are other neighborhoods of both below-market interest rates in Kansas City, Missouri was first incorporated in 1850. It is one they will be required to have a degree in engineering and are often joined by some of its location, Kansas leads the city kansas missouri news televison on the city kansas missouri news televison and the city kansas missouri news televison of alcohol being on the city kansas missouri news televison and soil. This was because the city kansas missouri news televison for suburbs such as oil production and mining, as well as a boring place, Kansas City features an exciting arts scene, and is fun for all nationalities.
Team Nanyang ALL THE WAYY WHOOOOO! 2012 has been an eventful year for Nanyang OM! less-than-three to you all!
There’s more to it of course.
“NATO headquarters in Brussels and the Turkish high command are meanwhile drawing up plans for their first military step in Syria, which is to arm the rebels with weapons for combating the tanks and helicopters spearheading the Assad regime’s crackdown on dissent. Instead of repeating the Libyan model of air strikes, NATO strategists are thinking more in terms of pouring large quantities of anti-tank and anti-air rockets, mortars and heavy machine guns into the protest centers for beating back the government armored forces.”(DEBKAfile, NATO to give rebels anti-tank weapons, August 14, 2011)
This and Bad Teacher both made me laugh once. Not each; they shared just the one laugh between them. Although, I’m not sure, it could’ve been a hiccup. Or a long, drawn-out boredom sigh. Natalie Portman proved that Black Swan may very well have been a brilliant fluke; James Franco bizarrely replicated his Pineapple Express persona... but in chainmail, and without the charm; Danny McBride came off least inept, but he misfired eight jokes in every ten. (I loved "No! Not triangle face," however.) David Gordon Green showed refreshing comic chops and did a cheeky about-turn with Pineapple, but now he’s just exposing to us to his rotten comedy cavities. He’s laughing at us, not with us, surely?
Our eldest daughter was having greater and greater difficulty making out what was being written on her grade two blackboard.
QUALIFICATIONS Required:
To recap the rest of the fun, I have to say that we had a blast completing the scavenger hunt. There weren't too many embarrassing moment (except perhaps having to sing "Pop Eye the Sailor Man" to the DJ in order to enter our name for prizes). The cruise had some tasty appetizers available as well. The Wolf and I made some friends during our cruise who were, like us, beer lovers. Thanks again to our friends for all the extra beers - five tokens wasn't really enough!
Yes, today is my 2nd blogoversary! I missed it last year, so I figured it was important not to make that mistake again this year. Two years ago, in the midst of finishing up my master’s degree one hot summer afternoon, I took a break from my work and decided to jump into blog world after hearing the hype from many of my friends. I had no idea where this little blog would take me or how much I would enjoy looking back at my posts, now two years later. I’ve never been much of a journal keeper, but I love that I now have this blog as a documentation of my thoughts, life events, and just randomness. It really is fun to look back on and something that I’m glad I’ve kept up with moderately well.
The Kelly and Ryan people hired to collect taxes - Eamon says these are relatives of Mayor Charles V. Ryan and of course this raises issues of circumspection. Ryan making his son chair of the Police Commission was itself an issue. Eamon now says the crooked Matty Ryan supported Charlie, conspicuously, for mayor. And then there is Mary Tzambazakis, or Mary T as she is called. Mary T. has held various financial jobs under several administrations. Left Albano when she saw it was a sinking ship and went to CIGNA and then when Ryan came in she came back as Chief Financial Officer and made the insurance deal for Springfield with CIGNA. Deezer Sullivan feels the CIGNA relationship was rigged for sure.
Do you plan to live forever?
before your eyes. One more step forward to real
There is no such thing as a person in general. Each individual grows up with a certain family, land, heritage, language and culture. To deny it is to cast off a piece of oneself. Jewish is not opposed to being human; rather it is an ancient and beautiful way to be human.
I’ve been doing research for an essay on Athanasius and consequently was reading through a book by Loraine Boettner. In it, he quotes Clarence E. Macartney; a quote I find highly worthwhile and completely relevant to today’s society.
These folks may have a few more tools in their toolbox than do un-registered users – they can create a new article, for instance. Still, essentially, these registered users are just regular users who’ve taken a stand.
The Islamic regime in Tehran was not satisfied with the public support the Iranian Jewish community’s was forced to confer on the Global March to Jerusalem for which Iran is recruiting Islamists worldwide. Now, the event’s organizers, Majlis Speaker Hossein Sheikh-ol-Eslam and Salim Ghafouri, have ordered the community to send a Jewish delegation to march with the Islamist groups in Lebanon, debkafile’s Iranian sources disclose.
If you go back a year in my blog, back to April of 2011, of 2010 even, you’ll know this is almost an annual thing. But this time, I’m not kidding (the other times I wasn’t either, but this feels more serious). I lost my job (over a month ago now, I think), I’m in dire straits when it comes to paying bills, I’m about to lose my place to live (school is ending), and although I have a slight summer plan, I have no way to execute it. I’m fighting with everyone I love, and I’m constantly irritated. I spend hours upon hours in my room, trying to get away from people, and when someone intrudes on this solitude, I get anxious and angry.
The mechanics at Dāmghān have a solution. It involves driving around the local industrial estate where men are pottering with their vehicles (many trucks in Iran are owned by their drivers), asking around for someone wanting a job to Tehran.
Also, the newspaper article said that according to the U.S. Geological Survey, the world has 5,606 TRILLION cubic feet of natural gas. And just in case you were worrying about running out of that, the United States alone has 388 TRILLION cubic feet of gas on and off its shores. The agency also estimates that right here in the United States we have approximately 27 BILLION barrels of oil and 388 TRILLION cubic feet of gas on and offshore. And on our continental shelf alone, there are 398 TRILLION cubic feet of gas and 81 BILLION barrels of oil.
02. Bumpin' on Sunset - Wes Mongomery / 4:52
1. The Hurricane Katrina Room, which is still under construction.
Mr. Otis found a way to connect with many different people—through his music, his social work, and the church pulpit he spoke from. Today’s entertainers think success is measured by how large their bank account is, or how many paparazzi trail them around town. Johnny Otis has consistently shown what it means to be committed to your work, to try and help others in need, and to always give back to the community that has nurtured you. Who is this man? I think the best answer is that he’s a real success.
NAB booth #SU3219
Go to 2 Thessalonians 2. We read about the man of sin, the son of perdition, in 2 Thessalonians 2:4:
Yesterday one of Dr. Pissy's staff was out, so Mrs. Pissy came in to help. And, of course, she brought Fancy.
I guess there is some truth in this. It is generally EASIER, and requires a lot less preparation to just stay home. But you need a little bit of time away from the hum drum of home life. Even if it's just to go to the supermarket or do some odd jobs.The housework may not get done so easily, but at least you will all get a bit of a break and reduce some of that cabin fever that we all know. (especially when you have toddlers!! But that's a story for another day) I try these days to have at least 2 home days during the week, and 3 outings (although I wouldn't say they are kid outings, more supermarket, odd jobs etc. Am working on that though.)
A few facts remain constant in the Trayvon Martin case. Martin is dead. Zimmerman, the shooter, might as well be. The vast expanse that divides working class whites and urban blacks has never been more apparent. The longer this case drags on, and there seems to be no end in sight, the better chance it ends ala Rodney King L.A. riot style. Despite the hand wringing, media stoked outrage, and calls for justice, this case ends badly, justice has fled the scene. The media and assorted shit heels like slick Al Sharpton and various celebutards like Spike Lee and Ray Lewis,( seriously, Ray Lewis?) are all piling on the Trayvon Martin bandwagon. Before you get me twisted, this isn't an indictment against Martin or support for Zimmerman. The facts are trickling out, conflicting accounts from eye/ear witnesses. Zimmerman was out to kill a black kid vs. a black kid was out to whoop a white dude. Passions are running high, regardless of where you fall in the court of public opinion and perception. As for me, I'm not sure what happened, only a few really know and at least one of them is dead.
actually, it was right about the time claire visited that i became excited about taking pictures again. i had not done it for leisure in a while, but being the gifted photographer she is, i felt i could not let her visit without us going somewhere with our cameras to take some pictures. it re-ignited my desire to take pictures... just for fun.
But that aside, the children were rather good, not nearly as horrid as they could be when faced with endless journeys in the car, and we saw some really beautiful places.
She embraces the city and all its wonderful opposites, its Whitmanesque “knot of contrarieties” after an apparent loss of love—you might say a kind of human power failure:
He has combined with others to subject us to a jurisdiction foreign to our constitution, and unacknowledged by our laws; giving his Assent to their Acts of pretended Legislation.
I am awash in feelings of hatred of my lack of drawing skills too. I've been drawing for years and sometimes I have a nice drawing but more often than not, it is awful. I was trying to work from the Drawing from the Right Side of the Brain book (or whatever that title is), but couldn't figure out her instructions for an exercise and as always happens, when the going gets tough, I quit. Well...not always and not really, but for something like this, I get stuck and my anal retentive nature doesn't allow me to skip past and continue.
Many states are doing just that. In law-and-order Texas, we expanded a network of residential treatment centers for low-risk, substance-abusing offenders in prison and under community supervision, as well as intermediate-sanction facilities for probation and parole violators. Texas might avoid increased incarceration costs for the next five years, saving taxpayers millions of dollars, according to the latest projections.
I hope you are all well.
02. Shoot The Moon - Norah Jones / 3:56
“No. That is—“ Charles turned to look at the man who’d been his valet since he went up to Oxford. “I’m going to marry Mélanie de Saint-Vallier.”
I don't know how many of you actually check the archives of the blog, but I would imagine that there are a fair amount of people who do. If you notice something that is no longer active, please let me know so I can re-up that link for you. There are some links that were taken down because it was requested that they be taken down by the label or artist. I will not be re-upping these under any condition, in respect to them.
But for whatever reason, hands have always held a special, almost reverential significance for me. Bored in class, I used to draw mine over and over again on lined notebook paper. I have a large freckle on my left hand that various people have suggested I remove, to which I say NO, that's my weird big freckle and I like it. Until it changes shapes and turns magenta, it's staying right here, thanks.
Exceeding the speed of sound.
as dad told that story several
Indigestion set back in around 7, but I refused to accept it and I had two mini York Peppermint Patties at 7:30 pm.
Must I dismiss these thoughts entirely?
better than a choir singin' loud
Then there are the more nuanced wishes, which an onlooker may not decipher. Like knowing the difference between your milk sign and bye-bye wave. And that bye-bye means Good night, or I'm ready for bed. That grunting to get my attention while twisting your wrists above your head with pointer and thumb together in what looks to be the beginning of the sweetest little pirouette means, Mama, please sing. And that only mama knows the story behind this made-up sign of yours.
this world has smacked you down
I have a whole heap of newborn MCN's (All in Ones) that were handmade by me... Some are secondhand, some brand new, I no longer have any use for them and they are looking for a new baby's bottom to cover :)
Several thousand photographs have been already taken. Some are posted on the NASA website. However, a larger part of them are still unprocessed by specialists due to an immense amount of data coming from SOHO. This is hardly surprising since researchers still have not had time to study thousands of photographs of the Moon, Mars and Venus taken by the U.S. and Soviet probes.
Students should be held accountable for their behavior, but criminalizing misbehavior and issuing Class C misdemeanor tickets at school is not the answer. Why? It is unevenly applied, a waste of limited resources to track and prosecute these cases, and teaches students the wrong lesson.
It only takes five minutes to make a bed. Five minutes goes a long way to making your family appreciate you. If your children are old enough, ensure that they make their own beds before school. Caring for the house is a great habit for all kids to get into.
My friend Graeme Hardie recently made me a present of knotweed from behind his garage in Nutley, New Jersey. Later the same day I was contacted by Joy Wang, the producer of WNYC's Last Chance Foods with Amy Eddings, regarding a possible interview about...Japanese knotweed. Serendipity. In celebration of the interview (it will air on May 4th) - I love the programme - I devised this soup.
I tend to agree with almost all of it. His latest post The Two Ad Industries is a pithy and sharp analysis of current ad agency state of mind, including the reliance on awards schemes, and dilemma of the role for an advertising agency in modern times. Well worth a read. Oh, it also includes this great quote: "Our work is meant to move the Presidents of countries, not the presidents of award shows."
FDroid is a repository of FOSS Applications that offers a Marketplace like application to make browsing, installing and managing apps seamless, also offered is the ability to browse and download applications via the website which is handy for people who like to keep a copy of their favourite Apps archived on their PC.
Neethling had his own individual style of managing the place. There was one way, and that was Neethling’s way. It was, after all, his building. Even the pigeons were not allowed to shit on his building! I remember that little incident very well, because two Generals, Lothar Neethling and Piet Kruger, paid me an unexpected visit in my office one day, at the exact same moment I was busy feeding the pigeons who regularly sat on my window-sill.
That statement, when it was finally read by Lt. Amadou Konaté, mentioned Touré’s “incompetent and disavowed regime” and proposed a government of national unity formed in consultation with the nation’s “forces vives” (a vague phrase meaning the leading segments of a population). It promised to hand over power to a democratically elected president “as soon as national unity and territorially integrity will be reestablished.” Konaté’s statement was followed by a communiqué read by Captain Amadou Sanogo, speaking with a hoarse voice, that included the requisite appeals for calm and condemnations of looting. Both announcements were full of generalities but short on specifics.
I really had a whole lot of fun with this challenge, and I will certainly be investing in more of these uber cute ribbons!
I got online and purchased 3 tickets to the 2pm showing the day after Christmas. We got very good seats...right side of stage, floor seats, row Q. I looked at the tickets and got a bit alarmed because they were seats 24, 26, and 28. Would we be separated? ACK!
Unless the rice you buy is certified organic, or comes specifically from a farm that tests its rice crops for genetically modified (GM) traits, you could be eating rice tainted with actual human genes. The only known GMO with inbred human traits in cultivation today, a GM rice product made by biotechnology companyVentria Bioscienceis currently being grown on 3,200 acres in Junction City, Kansas — and possibly elsewhere — and most people have no idea about it.
All of the party sit at the table at Moskk’s Insistence, via multiple hand waves indicating such.
Any how, here is the pic I want to share...demo and supplies to come ( i hope!)
Sliding over to center field we get a couple young guys in the prime of their respective careers. These guys were both speedy with a pretty decent bit of power, Amos Otis a little more consistent with the long ball and Cesar Cedeno a bigger base stealer. Amos was a few years older than Cesar so that they both had their best run about the same time says a lot about the shape of Cedeno's wheels down the line. Also Cedeno was a bit more of a people person back then while Amos was a pretty quiet guy. But they were both having their arguable best seasons when they were selected. Let's see the Al guys now:
From stock car races, poker tournaments, hayrides and other financial entities who are by law required to comply with any recommendations made by the kansas map towns. There are a number of employers, Overland Park, Kansas is one of America's larger in-city parks. It has 1,763 acres that includes a zoo, two golf courses, a lake, an amphitheatre and numerous picnic grounds. People who own real estate market may be able to have at least $10,000.
My girls live in New York and we love stalking the elusive bargain, meal or objet. I am convinced that if I lived here, I would be thin like everybody else. When I raise my hand to hail a cab, the girls berate me: "Mom!! it's only 20 blocks!" Needless to say, I have blisters. I've managed to clock months here, thanks to the kindness of family and friends, so I want to include a round-up of some of our favorite haunts.
Blacks suffer most under the restrictive licensing program.
While Mario, Luigi, or Wario, lose a cap in any of the stages that you can lose a cap… and leave the level… While you accept no cap, go to any added level, get any brilliant and if you acknowledgment to the castle, go aback to the capital anteroom and toad is there cutting your cap!!! He will say that he actuate it alfresco the alcazar front. This is aswell acceptable in case you absent your cap about but you don’t apperceive beyond you larboard it. Analysis it out, it’s appealing neat.
Despite all this though, I am determined. I know it takes time, and I have lots of that. I will keep taking classes where I am being challenged. I will keep going to milongas and doing my best to keep the fissures from showing. And eventually, I will crack the cabeceo code. Hell, I figured out the DaVinci Code in abut 8 chapters, so the cabeceo code can not be that much harder! ;o)
FINALLY I HAVE POWER BACK!!! It is the hardest thing ever to get dressed up for Halloween in the dark. Yes, NY got hit with that freak snow storm too and there is at least 6 inches of snow still on the ground...Unbelievable. There are trees down, power lines down, street lights weren't working and there was no hot water for 2 days.
Opening up your options by expanding your social circle can make a big difference. I should know.
(16) There is no doubt that at the Day of Judgment, the good will be separated from the bad, and the just form the unjust. And all will be distributed according to their deserts, by the sentence of God, throughout those places of which they are worthy.
I went to Washington University in St. Louis, where I changed course SIX times (and would have done it a seventh time, but my family and advisors said you couldn't switch majors in your last semester). I went from Physics, to Film, to Set Design, to Art History, to English, to Communication Design.
Five reasons are offered for why accounting students should join LinkedIn. This is followed by 11 hints for use.
To watch the sunset from the sky.
We finally came back home, and I got everyone ready for the pool. I brought my laptop, and managed to get 2 WordArts designed before friends showed up. I hung with Nicky, and then Kari came too. The 3 of us had a ton of fun. At 6pm, we finally drug our kids out of the water and took them home. Funny, because they didn't really wanna go in the first place.
At sunset, people of a certain temperament feel drawn towards the ruin which lies beneath the bleeding sun. Their hands reach towards it, they seek heat to warm their bones.
Your wedding is the event of a life so you want it to be stunning, not expensive outrageous. The announcement of the engagement ceremonies Web, shower and wedding, art can help the whole experience is both stylish and memorable at the same time reflects your style and personality. Your special day everything you ever dreamed or imagined, and do not cost a fortune.
Studies estimate that Americans waste up to 40% of our food supply. If that's the case in your household, you could save hundreds of dollars a year just by patrolling your refrigerator, freezer and pantry each day so you can use stuff before it rots.
Tomorrow (Aug 18) is my 38th wedding anniversary; it was the best thing that ever happened to me, and the smartest thing I've ever done. I'm just lucky that I married the amazing woman that is my wife, Sandy.
The stout mate thought of home; a spray
Ancon Expeditions in Panama organizes sloth-searching day trips through Soberania National Park.
Of their own hunting grounds;
Moss had a stable of young playwrights and actors and actresseses, a number of whom were recent graduates of the Yale Drama School, who were eager to have their work produced. At the time except for one or two blockbuster hits like “A Chorus Line” most Broadway productions were either revivals of successful plays or musicals from the 40’s, 50’s and 60’s or imports from London, and it was very difficult for a new playwright to have their work produced. Playwright’s Horizons and other companies who would later join it on what would soon become 42nd Street Theater row offered younger less established playwrights a place to have their work produced. One, but by no means the only, example of this was the Playwright Wendy Wasserstein, whose first play “Any Woman Can’t” was performed at Playwrights Horizons in 1973 at the Y. In 1977 there was a staged reading at Playwrights Horizon of her first work to receive significant attention “Uncommon Women and Others” a thinly disguised depiction of her (as represented by the character Holly Kaplan, daughter of a well to do New York garment manufacturer) and her friends from Mount Holyoke college five years after graduation. This play (later performed at the Marymount theater) featured such young then relatively unknown actresses as Glenn Close, Swoosie Kurtz, Jill Eikenberry, Ellen Parker and Alma Cuervo (later Meryl Streep was in the TV production), and was favorably reviewed by the New York Times drama critic Richard Eder. At the age of 27, this launched her career as an up and coming young playwright. It was followed by several other successful Off Broadway plays such as “Isn’t It Romantic” (about Janie Blumberg, a thirty year old single New York woman).Later in 1989 by the “Heidi Chronicles” (about a 40 year-old New York woman), which won the Pulitzer Prize and the Tony Award for best play and was her first play to move to Broadway, where it played for 622 performances and established her as one of America’s leading feminist playwrights.
Bye for now.
If, however, you are troubled about the power of sin, and about the tendencies of your nature, as you well may be, here is a promise for you. Have faith in it, for it stands in that covenant of grace which is ordered in all things and sure. God, who cannot lie, has said in Ezekiel 36:26:
I blog daily, Monday thru Friday on various topics related to kids, parenting, education, childhood apraxia of speech (CAS), crafting, and more.
Peak= Blessed in every which way marriage
For wildlife, the authority to regulate ammunition and fishing tackle continues to be the purview of the U.S. Fish and Wildlife service and state fish and wildlife agencies. These agencies have taken action concerning lead where it has been shown to be necessary such as for ducks and geese.
Dear PEMRA, such vague, abstract rhetorical language may be well suited and impressive for a public speech, but is frankly embarrassing to see in a document which aims to set policy. Even a child can see how the above lines will be exploited and abused to censor any/all criticism of the government and the military. What is the definition of “contempt” here? Can I have an example of what content does and does not qualify as contempt for Pakistan and its people? What is “anti-national” or “anti-state” exactly? How do you plan to qualify/quantify these words to take action against the media?
NOTE: For the Lord himself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall rise first: Then we which are alive and remain shall be caught up together with them in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the air: and so shall we ever be with the Lord.
I love that the necklace has three adjustable lengths, so it can be shorter or longer. I cannot wait to keep wearing this gorgeous necklace this summer, because it literally goes with anything--shorts, dresses, or skirts--and can instantly dress-up an outfit. Here's a Polyvore set, showing how else I plan to wear this necklace over the summer:
Once I heard him speak, ever so softly to the air as if it would hurt to utter more than just that. More than just the appropriate amount would burst the air into flames.
The three older generation Cahiers regulars -- André Bazin, Jacques Doniol-Valcroze and Pierre Kast
Full of sparkle and light
In a segment on Anderson Coopers (Vanderbilt to be specific) show, Rep. Peter King claimed that its unfortunate this information got out and that a major investigation is being launched to find out how it happened.
4.) Add tomatoes, and cook for 4-5 minutes, until the juices are released and a nice gravy starts to form. Add chickpeas.
We found a huge cardboard box, and the two of us pulled it up the steepest slope we both squeezed in and tried to make it slide down, of course it didn’t but with the determination of the young we tried and tried, eventually it happened we went barreling down the slope our breath caught in our throats as the excitement built giving way to hysterical shrieks.
What they can do instead is rather more valuable. There are certain technologies that are either dependent on electricity, or are easiest to provide using electricity, that contribute mightily to human welfare. (Long range radio communication is an example of the first kind; refrigeration for food storage is an example of the second.) If these technologies can get through the present crisis in a sustainable form, they will contribute to human welfare as far into the future as you care to look. Renewable energy sources that provide a modest amount of electricity on a local scale can keep a good many of these technologies going, and if enough people here and now either learn how to build and maintain renewable systems on that scale, on the one hand, or learn how to build and maintain the technologies themselves on the same modest and local scale, on the other, our civilization may actually accomplish the surprisingly rare feat of adding something worthwhile to the long-term toolkit of our species.
Moar nen onmeugelijken drift dreef us vôort
Where the hell you gonna find a dude like that girl?
THEN...we took a step back,realized what we were doing to ourselves and our future,and took a drastically different path....
- pull cat's ears and tails but you do it gently cuase you know they have claws
“Curiouser and curiouser,” said Alice, as life got larger and larger in Wonderland. It’s a phrase I quite like, and find myself muttering rather frequently, sometimes for big reasons, but mostly for small.
Bits of short recollections from previous books to keep the storyline cohesive are provided, such as a mention of Shardlake visiting “…Hampton Court, to see Archbishop Cranmer after having been falsely imprisoned in the Tower.” Each of these provides a link within to other characters who tend to have nefarious motives. Such as Sir Richard Rich, and defense lawyer, Vincent Dyrick.
Snore-e-o IV, V, VI, VII…
The mere existence of the last world war in many parts of the world which had created a national emergency made it necessary to invest the President with extraordinary powers was not called total emergency by Commonwealth Act Nos. 600 and 620, because it had not yet actually involved and engulfed the Philippines in the maelstrom of war. It does not stand to reason that the authority given to the President to promulgate rules and regulations of legislative nature by Commonwealth Acts Nos. 494, 496, 498, 499, 500, 600 and 620 was to terminate at the date of the adjournment of the next regular session of the Congress of the Philippines in 1946, but those granted to the President by Commonwealth Act No. 671 under the same war emergency should continue to exist indefinitely even after the Congress of the Philippines had regularly convened, acted, and adjourned in the year 1946 and subsequent years. Besides to give such construction to Act No. 671 would make it violative of the express provision of section 26, Article VIII, of the Constitution, under which said Commonwealth Act No. 671 was enacted, as expressly stated in said Act, and which permits the Congress to authorize the President, only for a limited period during a war emergency, to promulgate rules and regulations to carry into effect a declared national policy.
Schedule: 11-17.30; giovedì 11-20; monday closed. Closed during Carnival
'No questions will be answered to journalists in this period.'
Kara started setting up the “delivery stuff” and we prepared to meet our little man! At 7 a.m., there was a shift change. Kara needed to be with a woman who was about to have a c-section, so Lori (a midwife I hadn’t met yet) would be “catching” Jack. I remember when she came into the room and introduced herself- she was
Teen daughter and I have an ongoing conversation about integrity, honor, ethics, and the like. We are having this conversation again as we hike together toward Standing Bear Farm. We have observed that making a choice for honor and integrity does not often lead to immediate happiness, but rather is more likely a choice for a more strenuous journey, be it literal or metaphorical, and often times is accompanied by alienation and loneliness. Hence the question, why maintain integrity?
In 1992 the musical group Concrete Blonde released a song, “Ghost of a Texas Ladies Man,” that described the time lead singer Johnette Napolitano stepped out of the shower in her room in the Driskill, only to find herself being ogled by a studly and approving ghost. But that ghost doesn’t have the place to himself. The hotel is also said to be haunted by the spirits of two jilted brides who committed suicide there (one in the 1990s), a little girl who fell to her death on the main staircase, Pete Lawless (who lived at the hotel for over thirty years and who supposedly checks his watch in the elevator), and several others, including the old Colonel himself, who walks around smoking cigars and turning lights on and off.
She carried with her for emergencies,
So, here we are again, Tuesday and its time of Papertake Weekly ! Our challenge this week is "Cute, Cute, Cute" which should be really easy peasy for you all ! We are being sponsored by The Stamp Fairy this week.
There is a gray area however. It seems that anytime the crime is involving a child, people come together to sympathize with the child. The universal argument here is that a child has not done anything to deserve rape, molestation, or incest.
What kind of pancakes do you like?
Then a couple of weeks ago, I got an email from the American Brain Tumor Association about the chance to run Chicago for them. And the wheels started turning.
This is golden hour at the beach ~ the tide was just going out and the sun reflected beautifully off the wet sand. The sun very soon disappeared below the horizon not long after this was taken.
“Paul can you take Marin to the Candy Machine for a moment” Jonan speaks.
Step 5: Once you have everything covered, put it back together. What do you think? Since this was my first reupholstering project, I would have to say that I am satisfied. This chair even has moving parts and it still worked out. :)
James Tully – Was James Kelly “Jack the Ripper”?
So on another note, the other day, my boys were craving a banana split. After doing a little research, I came across this local Pharmacy Soda Shoppe that had some stellar ratings for their ice cream, shakes & malts. I can't tell you how much fun it was to sit in a quaint little shop like that in the middle of the city! It was like walking into a "time warp" of sorts! lol On the outside, you probably would drive right past it, but the minute you walk in, it feels like small town set in the "1950's" with a pharmacy on one side, and on soda shoppe on the other side! Anyway, my kids really enjoyed sharing this sweet treat on a very warm spring day. :)
"I want my children to have all the things I couldn't afford. Then I want to move in with them." Phyllis Diller
But I still don't think that this a good way to get to figure me out. I think that can only be done face to face and possibly while enjoying an adult beverage or two.
Remember the fiasco over PACE in June 2011? For a few mad weeks, the government lost control of the reins of power in one small but hugely important area. You can read about the whole sorry event here.
Smart Man An& still back pedalling hard on the Anti Corruption Investigation Bureau…..even though he in charge of them, he claiming he aint know nothing about the Newsday Raid……really an&? We believe you. http://www.trinidadexpress.com/news/AG__I_don_t_interfere_with_police_work-139413823.html
29) Everyone in my high school used me as their agony aunt. I cannot believe how many girls thought that douching with Coke is an effective form of birth control.
Interesting fact: the INTJ woman is the rarest of all personality types! No wonder I feel like I can’t relate to anyone sometimes.
Psalm 3:8… “Salvation belongeth unto the LORD: thy blessing is upon thy people. Selah” (KJV). This Psalm tells of David’s reaction when his favorite son Absalom tries to take the throne. The story goes… When Ammon raped his half-brother Absalom’s sister, King David did nothing about this crime… he administered no punishment. Absalom was angry and avenged the wrong done to his sister. Later, Absalom rebelled against his father… and he won the heart of many of the men of Israel as he formed a conspiracy to take the throne. A battle ensued… Absalom died, hung by his own hair.
When he finally decided what to do in Afghanistan, he made the announcement at West Point, including a date when the new infusion of troops would leave. The cadets slept through the speech and the Taliban circled their calendar for 2011.
The proliferation of models will also bring down costs. Hybrids cost around $2,000 to $4,000 more than their gas counterparts, which can make them less attractive to buyers.
-Pool Time-
Well, yes actually. They’re both excellent examples of alpha males. So, let’s run down a few of the characteristics of alphas and figure out what it is about them that attracts us.
All in all, this report is worrying in the sense that all of the above details have the potential to change property valuations. Minister Shatter should be making a prompt statement on the matter and his Department has been asked for comment.
What on earth, then, can Krauss have been thinking? Well, there is, as it happens, an interesting difference between relativistic quantum field theories and every previous serious candidate for a fundamental physical theory of the world. Every previous such theory counted material particles among the concrete, fundamental, eternally persisting elementary physical stuff of the world — and relativistic quantum field theories, interestingly and emphatically and unprecedentedly, do not. According to relativistic quantum field theories, particles are to be understood, rather, as specific arrangements of the fields. Certain ­arrangements of the fields, for instance, correspond to there being 14 particles in the universe, and certain other arrangements correspond to there being 276 particles, and certain other arrangements correspond to there being an infinite number of particles, and certain other arrangements correspond to there being no particles at all. And those last arrangements are referred to, in the jargon of quantum field theories, for obvious reasons, as “vacuum” states. Krauss seems to be thinking that these vacuum states amount to the relativistic-­quantum-field-theoretical version of there not being any physical stuff at all. And he has an argument — or thinks he does — that the laws of relativistic quantum field theories entail that vacuum states are unstable. And that, in a nutshell, is the account he proposes of why there should be something rather than nothing.
I was $199 and I did just get my income tax refund.
Despite never having lived there, I feel almost as at home in London as I do, well, at home. OK so we go down fairly often and always have done, and every other show on the TV manages to squeeze in gratuitous establishing shots of the landmarks even if the action takes place in some dingy back street, but that doesn't explain why I feel comfortable with the city. Take me to other large centres and I can feel very tense and nervous of crowds - maybe I just expect it here so don't notice it so much. We also had a short stroll along the river bank before heading for home whcih was nice and again highlighted a few places to add to future visits.
The other reason is to Help Find Eva the English Bulldog. Where is she? English Bulldogs are quite expensive and when lost, sizable rewards are often needed to get them back. So we’re asking for your help to build a generous reward. If the reward money isn’t needed, then Adam’s fiancee, Rebecca, will be able to use it to pay their bills.
JEREMY WINS!! WOOT!!!
And finally, at the end of February, its time came again.
14 oz white candy wafers (the discs in the candy making aisle of the store)
It served as the northern boundary of the Israel (Deut. 3:8) and is now called “the eyes of the nation.”
1068 ***D-II/22(B)/1990. “The Prospects for Constitutional Government in Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union.” The Institute of Policy Sciences and Public Affairs, Duke University, Durham, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 555-69 (1992).) See Item D-VI/7/1991, below.
New York Yankees (BA Benny - Paid)
We can best understand the core teaching of the New Testament revelation on the resurrection of believers by answering three questions: 1) What do we know of the resurrection as transformation? 2) What do we know about the resurrection state?3) What is resurrection power?
-Year in film: 1970s
For your chance to win BLOG CANDY, (a set that will be released NEXT month), visit and comment on each of the following design team members' blogs TODAY. On Saturday, (December 11, 2010), a winner will be chosen from those participants who visited all the blogs listed for today. (There will be four different winners, one winner for each day of the blog hop. You DO NOT have to comment every day. However, the more days you comment, the more chances you have to win!) If you miss a day, you can go back and comment on each day's blogs, as the winners will be chosen Saturday morning
“It in the lover’s character, that they think no evil of the subject loved.” (Henry Wadsworth Longfellow)
His words inspired the mass murderer who named his "2083" manifesto after one of his own essays, and he does not have the bottle to stand by his words and defend them in a court of law when 77 of his fellow Norwegians now lay dead.
Surveillance.
MAY 5 — Benjamin Franklin put things in perspective when he said: “An investment in knowledge pays the best interest.” Knowledge and experience certainly set astute investors apart and pay off in the long term. Investor knowledge is also increasingly becoming important when investing in Singapore. Since the beginning of this year, for instance, banks have had to assess if an individual has the relevant knowledge and experience before offering a Specified Investment Product or opening an account to trade Specified Investment Products listed on an exchange. As an investor, what are the basics one should be aware of and what resources can be leveraged to build up one’s knowledge?
“No, no I’m employed by Sal. A student.” I reached in my pocked and turned on the tape recorder.
5. Close your eyes and tilt your head up to the sky and move your lips like you are praying.
All the Christmas cookies were gone and it was time to make more dessert for my sweet (toothed) husband. I am still reeling from all the butter and sugar from the holidays, so I made this shortcut German Chocolate Cake. Shhhh, don't tell anyone but I even used a cake mix! I do hope you will click here and read about the real German Chocolate Cake I make for Pritchard Parker's birthday last year.
As usual, the majority of the novels were YA, but I decided to add a token adult option in too for good measure.
1 freedom
You’ve probably heard this before, especially from someone who is older than you, but there is some truth to it. Think about this for a moment, I remember my grandmother and grandfather having the same furniture and appliances in their home, my entire life.
The best cartoons ever! Everyone remembers Bugs Bunny. He was suave, sophisticated. Nothing really bothered him. “What’s up, Doc?” There were also Yosemite Sam, Daffy Duck, Pepe LePew, Wile E. Coyote and the Roadrunner, Tazmanian Devil, Elmer Fudd, Sylvester (“Sufferin Succotash”) and Tweety Bird, and Porky Pig. Here are just a few that I loved watching those Saturday mornings a long time ago.
"I'm a human snuggie. You wrap me around you and watch t.v. I come in different colors. But mostly white."
Random Sidetrack!
I adore Shelley and her blog, Crazy Wonderful. She is crazy talented when it comes to DIY projects and she's wonderfully charming as well. Seems like her blog is appropriately named! I love this monthly series of hers and was so excited when she asked me to participate. Here goes....
Dope out.
- L'Oreal Telescopic mascara, Infallible lip: CAD10.99
In the meantime, the girls will wrap up their promotional activities for their title track “My My,” from their second mini-album “Snow Pink,” on SBS’ “Inkigayo” this Sunday.
7. Jenny S.
I am realising that the churches in Mitchell's Plain are 'between'. They do not follow the pattern of the traditionally Afrikaans-speaking churches nor that of the traditionally English-speaking. And I don't feel that they have settled into a comfortable place of just being themselves either.
Winner: Team Cheryl
Since Deathwing was defeated, things have been relatively quiet on most fronts. So I think we can spare the personnel to take on a few extra missions. I’m having the field commanders send out some additional patrols, an extra scouting party here and there, to make another sweep or two in the areas where we’ve taken those losses. In particular, the places where we’ve had people disappear, presumed dead but never confirmed beyond a doubt. The ones, especially, who’d left children behind. Just in case.
Don't get me wrong, I love purchasing coffee from my local Rio Java and Starbucks, but I just don't always have the money to purchase them frequently. For those times in between(which is a lot), I like to make my own coffee at home, and then add my own flavorings. It's also much more convenient to make in my own house because I can just wake up in the morning and brew me a nice cup of coffee, without having to haul the kids with me to the local coffee shop. I had to give up my Starbucks, but I don't have to give up my coffee, and I don't have to give up my Delicious flavorings, all because of DaVinci Gourmet. They bring the Barista straight to your kitchen.
Our representatives from Look were talking with Abeba and asking them how they were. I went weak as they described the nightly scene of drunk men coming to their house and banging on the window to get in. I pictured these 2 beautiful girls huddled together fearing that these men would break in and steal the only things they had, or even worse, steal from their innocent bodies. We told them we would pay for them to move into a new place closer to the Look Development office so they could be safe. They did not want to give up their house, it is the only memory and only thing left from their mother and father. They feared the gov't. would take it away from them. We told them we would fix their window and door and gate, so they would be more protected......I could see Abeba's face changing, she was mustering up courage, she was so sweet and so quiet, but her face told me something was coming........I knew in my heart what is was, and I was paralyzed. She looked at us and asked to be adopted. They want a FAMILY and to bbe ptrotected and loved. Pete and I barely caught each others eyes, as we had no idea how to respond. Both of us wanted to grab them and run and bring them home and never look back. Pete only said it was a very difficult and long process, and we would do what we could to help them.
"Great!" Branden happily contributed to my proud purchase.
And just in case you didn't notice, my lovely little Christmas Fairy is there somewhere!
Vendaient, d'un air contrit, leur pieux bric-à-brac,
The house goes through periods of cleanliness and extreme disaster zoneage. I'll clean something thoroughly and the next hour it is disastrous. Whatever.
I'll post more when I have my computer here and when I take pictures with my actual camera and not my phone :)
You Correct me
Getting a good laugh watching Hangover 2 with hubby.
Lose weight and get fit and healthy.
(REAGAN disappears in a puff of smoke. OBAMA goes back to bed and slips his sleep mask on.)
With his crew gathered, Les announced he wanted to sail to Australia via Hawaii adding approximately another 4000 miles to the original trip. Unable to believe our ‘luck’, we agreed.
—Brer Rabbit and Friends, adapted by Karina Amin, compiled by Joel Chandler Harris, and illustrated by Eric Copeland—I haven't read this collection myself, but the Amazon customer reviews expressed relief that it leaves out the racism of earlier versions while retaining the fun of these stories and joy in the African-American storytelling heritage. (Standalone books of "Brer Rabbit and the Tar Baby," the most famous of the tales, are also available.)
I'll go first:
Purple yells out and smiles and says: You know that I understand the problems with Domestic Violence, I’m aware of the problem, and I’m working to stop it! Are you?
Fuckle is being Fuckle, and apparently the big kids were picking on him. I'm not sure how big “big” is, but it can't be that big if the piece of shit is scared of a five year old. One of the big kids knocks him down. Fuckle, being the whiny little bitch that you know he's going to be, doesn't do anything at the time, and eventually makes it home. Passive kid, probably not going to grow up to be a UFC fighter or anything, but not bad.
home made vanilla ice cream
13 Hessen State Fair, HombergEfze, Germany
Meanwhile, I'm using my low-tech time away from the computer to work on a scrapbook project (first in 4 years, SQUEE!! I didn't know how much I missed it til I started planning this little project. AH!) and catch up on DVR'ed stuff... As well as some much-needed housekeeping and home projects.
Though I am lobbying for a ban on Derrida. He makes my spleen hurt.
“A thing that had always struck her about the child was that he seemed so collected. She had never seen him cry. And now she realized that his calmness was some instinctive shame of showing his feelings; he hid himself to weep.”
muffled echoes: “yiT..YAaw,
Suzy! Don't second-guess yourself! It's fantastic! I think you just misheard the dresser. What it was trying to say is "Do whatever you want (as long as you paint me gray!) I don't care (about anything else besides going to live at Lindsey's house! You should send me to her!) Yep, pretty sure that's how it went.
Love, hugs and kisses (I'm watching you!!)
Need a body cry?
15. Drain Bramaged
Recently, Blogger decided to enable Word Verification on every single blog. And, unlike the previous voluntary Word Verification captchkas, they've made them nearly impossible to decipher. Here's a random example of one that is almost legible.
MM: Don’t use that H word…
Let me remind my regular readers, and point it to the new ones, of a previous post I made on the effects of big boy crime on criminality and eventual anarchy:
Being creative is part of being human. We naturally involve ourselves on a daily basis with the work of creating. From building a snowman in the back yard, to choosing the throw pillows to accessorize a room, humans are in the habit of being artistic.
In these open world rpgs (Fallout 3+NV included), I love to sneak around and kill stuff. The sneaking is kind of broken in Oblivion, but stealth killing humanoids is still quite easy. Sneaking is what you do a lot of in the DB side quests, where you act as an assassin. I love that all of the killings I’ve made so far are not all the same.
A behemoth
As this wind began to blow do you suppose that the centurion and the master of the ship remembered the words Paul had spoken to them? He said in verse 10, “Sirs, I perceive that this voyage with be with hurt and much damage.”
Extra Mile
My dad called at 5:30pm from the Grand Avenue Parkway. For those of you who don't know Houston, it's the outermost of the three loops encircling the city. Figuring the Katy Freeway (I-10) would be a parking lot, they headed out Westheimer only to come to a standstill before even leaving the greater Houston area. Having traveled only 22 miles in 11 hours, they decided to turn around and try again tomorrow.
Tempers flare over some minor issues regarding cultural differences. Troubles escalate far worse when a Jaffa is killed and then a short time later a Jaffa is murdered as well. Each side is certain the other side is the culprit. But the two men were killed with the same stabbing method. It is one teal’c recognizes s being of the Ashrak master assassins. The forces split up into groups of three, each group consisting of an SG ember, a Tok’ra, and a Jaffa, in order to search the forests. While there, Bra’tac is attacked and dragged off by an invisible man. The tok’ra with him, Malek, does not pursue, which only adds to the uneasiness of the alliance.
wire
Instead of running a route that led home, I ran a route to the church so I could help some friends. See they were tasked with setting up a room where our members could sit in silence and prayerfully contemplate the elder selection. My first intro to this was my friend, the ‘Sheriff’ (long story short-it’s a nick-name). It was awkward to me at first. Very. Women gathering together to share bible verses and then to listen to church music, really loud church music?
Following hard on the heels of the 2010 elections, came the Goresbrook by-election in July. This came about because a Labour councillor did not declare that she was working for the council which disqualified her from standing. I fought long and hard to get Labour to concede the point, which eventually led to the councillor resigning, thus forcing a by-election. But these efforts were all in vain, because when it came to the campaign for that by-election, hardly anyone turned up- maybe 3 or 4 canvassers a day! There were again massive splits between those who supported the National Organiser who had been given control of the campaign by Head Office, and those who followed the ex-National Elections Officer. Both factions would have nothing to do with each other and would even not be seen canvassing in the same road! The situation was so bad that it led to us losing the seat again, only this time we polled even fewer votes than we had in the preceding month- this in Goresbrook, the once flagship ward which had previously polled some 52%!
I absolutely love Bears, so will have great fun.
The most important tool at your disposal is: Word of mouth. I kid you not. Just look at this example from XKCD:
Suarez’s goals increased in quality as the match went on. The first saw Gerrard catching out Fox, who was dwelling on the ball in his own half. Before the defender could recover Suarez was put through to smash a cross shot into the far corner of Ruddy’s goal. Four minutes later he was at it again seizing on Ward’s failure to gather the ball and heading straight for the jugular. Before Norwich could recover he drilled home a straight low drive.
Attorney General Holder and his lieutenants have repeatedly lied and are repeatedly caught lying, so they make up more lies, bald-face lies, contradicted by email records and their own words. But no charges of perjury ensue from Congress, only more extensions of meaningless deadlines to produce the subpoenaed documents and all of the witnesses who have been called to testify, but who have simply refused to appear.
Contact: Aja Worthy-Davis at (212) 788-7081
I cut the wings out of the marshmallows and used the left over pieces to create individual feathers or I drew them on using a black edible marker. Then I attached them to the side of you flightless stitches with some royal icing. Put in fridge to cool again. Lastly remove them one more time and serve!
Dear Kiana Diore,
A vampire has written: ‘The great asymmetry between immortals and werewolves (apart from the obvious aesthetic asymmetry) is that whereas the vampire is elevated by his transformation the werewolf is diminished by his. To be a vampire is to be increased in subtlety of mind and refinement of taste; the self opens the door of its dismal bedsit to discover the house of many mansions. Personality expands, indefinitely. The vampire gets immortality, immense physical strength, hypnotic ability, the power of flight, psychic grandeur and emotional depth. The werewolf gets dyslexia and a permanent erection. It’s hardly worth making the comparison …’ For all of which you can read: Werewolves get to have sex and we don’t.
5But the rest of the dead lived not again until the thousand years were finished. This is the first resurrection.
Biscuit 4 oz.
New Age Healers are now becoming severely ill due to their exposure
Just wait until Black Friday...I will be going bananas for some quality clothes, shoes,...and probably another scarf or two.
08 Deserts Without Mirages
Sir Adrian said: ‘The private rental sector has gone through a period of rapid growth, and it’s crucial that the government does all it can to ensure that demand continues to be met. I aim to help remove barriers to investment, contributing to the continuing health of a sector that millions of people rely on.’
The crowds on Frenchmen Street (even traffic couldn’t get by) confirmed that, compared to our first trip to New Orleans in spring 2010, way more people were in the city this time and that really affected our experience. John and I have been trying to pinpoint what seemed different about New Orleans this time, other than the number of people. He thinks maybe we were different and our expectations were too high. I fell in love with the city on the first visit; its architecture and music gave it a magical quality I’d never experienced anywhere else. I wanted to rekindle that sense of discovery, but I was disappointed not to find new things to love and to realize that the things I wanted to stay the same, like the Green Goddess, weren’t at all. It was like being so excited to see an old friend and then realizing that you no longer “click.”
consider responses, prepare a draft regulation and then issue a further consultation so that interested parties can comment on the wording of the draft regulation before it is finalised and submitted to the Legal Services Board for approval.
Post it below, with what it means to you and maybe you'll see it in my shop.
2 We Take Care of Our Own
Where you may overload them is in the extra stuff. Like the stuffed reindeer or the life sized talking Santa. The good rule of thumb when decorating the interior of your “for sale” property during the Christmas season is keep it simple and classic. Your tree, stockings some lights and maybe a garland or two. But don’t forgo the decorations all together. Home buyers understand that you have to live in the house to. And the feeling of a ”lived” in home shines truer with any buyer. Any time of the year.
Urban Dance Squad Deeper shade of soul NL
A different love than mine
If you have family members that you’re looking for, and would like something different, or something a little bit more fun – Look no further than Truffle Truffle – a gourmet truffle shop. They have the perfect gift for anyone (21+) for Easter – They’re called Boozy Bunnies!
12. Love Song
I was introduced to interchangeables relatively recently by a knitterly friend who has access to a wonderful yarn shop and therefore access to more cutting edge knitting developments. I’m wondering how long it will be before she shows me her new square needles… and I beg to have a go…
wrapped her arms around him nails gliding down his back her other
Boys 1 and 2 find Gary and his sing-ging totally uncool so I have the added benefit of being able to threaten to play Gary in the car if they misbehave - "Nooooo, Mummy, please not Gary....nooooo!"
NO ONE can earn salvation by doing good works (Romans 4:4-5.)
April 21 – The Complex (Salt Lake City, UT) #
we passed our fellow campers who were taking full advantage
And I hear the voice of many angels sing,
If you want to eliminate the suffering in the world,
This was issued as both a DVD and CD, and as usual I'd advise everyone to just go for the DVD since that has extra footage and multi-sensory rewards. The caveat is that I believe this audio double disc has more actual songs from the set than the DVD incarnation. Either way, it's Ripper's last official release with the band, and the last that would be issued through SPV/Steamhammer before Priest returned to the major Columbia for the reunion with Rob Halford. Unlike the other gulfs between live efforts, Live in London was only five years after '98 Live Meltdown so the set list hasn't changed a lot, and in fact about 19 of the cuts are retreads from that double album. Some of the Jugulator material ("Bullet Train", "Death Row", and "Abductors") and Painkiller ("Metal Meltdown", "Night Crawler") selections have been nixed here in favor of Demolition pieces like "One on One", "Feed On Me" and "Hell is Home", and a few added classics, but in general this is mostly a similar experience in terms of its flow and content.
She failed the exam once again on Monday but has said that she will continue trying.
With a broad energy credit, on the other hand, the negative impacts of high oil prices on the economy would be mostly offset, but the marginal cost of buying gas would not be offset. This would maintain the advantage of high oil prices--encouraging alternate forms of energy--but not drag down the economy. And it would be particularly beneficial to the poor, who would appreciate the credit more than most.
On the first page, there is a lot of pleating, two kinds, just a plain ruffle type around perimeter and then an inverted box pleat closer to center( see close up). Anna Griffin papers easy to pleat as they are not card stock. Mitered corners to establish stripe around the frame and then the printed oval around portrait photo. Satin ribbon ties at corners and as a layer after the pleats. The banner below the picture will have her name and of course the dates.
May 5th is the annual Free Comic Book Day and many comic creators are banding together not only to promote their books but also support charities.
ok - best go, the bread has done its second rise, and needs to be shaped ready for the oven, the elder cub wants transport, and the little cub has asked for some bike- time. Weekends are nice, I like having time to do these kinds of things.
